

	PIF0004 | Prospect Income Finance Portfolio, Series 4 | UIT | Nuveen





































Nuveen









Individual Investor
Financial Advisor
Institutional Investor









Products





Products
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Exchange-Traded Funds
Commodity Exchange-Traded Products
Unit Trusts
Products for Non-U.S. Investors
Other
Alternatives
Multi-Asset Solutions




Performance
Mutual Funds
Separately Managed Accounts
Pricing
Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds
Unit Trusts







Insights





Market Commentary
Weekly Investment Commentary
Weekly Fixed Income Update
Product Commentary
Video Library
Conference Calls & Webinars




Investment Ideas
Adapt to Municipal Market Changes
Manage Key Income Risks
Reinvent Retirement Income Investing







Literature





Literature Center
Mutual Funds

									Forms & Applications
Prospectuses
									& Reports

									Fact Sheets & Commentary
Closed-End Funds
Fact
									Sheets & Reports










Resources





Client Resources

									Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds

									Tax Information
Mutual Funds Education
Overview
Advisor Resources
Wealth Management Services

									Account Access
Tools and Calculators
Bond Investing Ladder Tool




Alternatives Education
Alternatives Education Center
Closed-End Funds Education
Closed-End Fund Strategies
Understanding Closed-End Funds
Multi-Asset Resources
Explore Multi-Asset Investing







Retirement





Retirement Solutions
About Us
Investment Solutions




Practice Management
Resources
401(k)ollege
Plan Profit (k)alculator
Contact Us














Unit Trusts



MF
CEF
SMA
ETF
COM
UIT



UIT



Prospect Income Finance Portfolio, Series 4







Holdings
Pricing
Performance
Distributions











Portfolio Holdings




NameSymbolSectorWeight

PennantPark Investment Corporation PNNTFinancials6.52 %

Apollo Investment CorporationAINVFinancials6.50 %

Ares Capital CorporationARCCFinancials6.50 %

THL Credit, Inc. TCRDFinancials6.02 %

Solar Capital Ltd. SLRCFinancials5.98 %

Fifth Street Finance Corp.FSCFinancials5.06 %

Medley Capital Corporation MCCFinancials5.05 %

BlackRock Capital Investment CorporationBKCCFinancials4.50 %

Capitala Finance Corp.CPTAFinancials4.45 %

New Mountain Finance Corporation NMFCFinancials4.00 %

TCP Capital Corp. TCPCFinancials4.00 %

FS Investment CorporationFSICFinancials3.98 %

PennantPark Floating Rate Capital Ltd. PFLTFinancials3.96 %

Apollo Commercial Real Estate Finance, Inc.ARIFinancials3.49 %

Garrison Capital, Inc.GARSFinancials3.48 %

Golub Capital BDC, Inc. GBDCFinancials3.01 %

Blackstone Mortgage Trust, Inc.BXMTFinancials3.00 %

Goldman Sachs BDC, Inc. GSBDFinancials3.00 %

Arbor Realty Trust, Inc. 8.250% ABR AFinancials2.99 %

Ares Commercial Real Estate CorporationACREFinancials2.50 %

Stellus Capital Investment Corporation SCMFinancials2.03 %

Fidus Investment Corporation FDUSFinancials2.01 %

Monroe Capital Corporation MRCCFinancials2.01 %

Gladstone Investment CorporationGAINFinancials2.00 %

Fifth Street Senior Floating Rate Corp.FSFRFinancials2.00 %

Solar Senior Capital Ltd. SUNSFinancials1.96 %








Data used for the Portfolio Holdings and Portfolio Allocation Characteristics is from Bloomberg Finance L.P. Portfolio holdings are provided for informational purposes only and should not be deemed as a recommendation to buy or sell individual securities. Portfolio Holdings and Portfolio Allocation Characteristics are as of deposit day and are subject to change and may vary thereafter.
The style and capitalization characteristics are designed to help investors understand how they fit into an overall investment plan. Value, blend and growth are types of investment styles. Growth Investing generally seeks stocks that offer the potential for greater-than-average earnings growth, and may entail greater risk than value or blend investing. Value investing generally seeks stocks that may be sound investments but are temporarily out of favor in the marketplace, and may entail less risk than growth investing. A blend investment combines the two styles. Market capitalization is determined by the following criteria: Large Cap: Greater than $10 billion, Mid Cap: $2 billion-$10 billion, Small Cap: $250 million-$2 billion Micro Cap: Below $250 million.


This material is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.


Risk Considerations
				There is no assurance that a unit investment trust will achieve its investment objective. An investment in this unit investment trust is subject to market risk, which is the possibility that the market values of securities owned by the trust will decline and that the value of trust units may therefore be less than what you paid for them. This trust is unmanaged. You can lose money investing in this trust. This trust terminates approximately 2 years from the initial date of deposit.

				Investing in the trust units may involve a high degree of risk and is highly speculative and aggressive, and therefore an investment in trust units may not be suitable for someone with low risk tolerance.

				Common stocks do not assure dividend payments. Dividends are paid only when declared by an issuer’s board of directors and the amount of any dividend may vary over time.

				A portfolio concentrated in a single market sector may present more risk than a portfolio broadly diversified over several sectors. This trust is concentrated in the financials sector, particularly in business development companies ("BDCs") and real estate investment trusts ("REITs"). There are certain risks specific to the financials sector, and in particular, BDCs and REITs, including the potential adverse effects of economic recession, volatile interest rates, and state and federal regulations.
				 
				This trust is concentrated in the financials sector, particularly in business development companies ("BDCs") and real estate investment trusts ("REITs"). There are certain risks specific to the financials sector, and in particular, BDCs and REITs, including the potential adverse effects of economic recession, volatile interest rates, and state and federal regulations.

				This trust invests in BDCs and will be subject to risks associated with BDCs. BDCs are closed-end funds that have elected to be treated as business development companies and their ability to grow their overall financial condition is impacted significantly by their ability to raise capital, engage in borrowing, acquire suitable investments, and maintain their status as a BDC. Failure to do so will adversely affect the value of a BDC’s shares. BDCs generally employ leverage in their portfolios. While leverage often increases the yield of a portfolio, it may magnify the potential for gains and losses on amounts invested, and accordingly, may increase the volatility and/or risks associated with those shares. A BDC’s investments are frequently not publicly traded, and as a result, there is uncertainty as to the value and liquidity of those investments. BDCs are subject to laws or regulations governing BDCs that could negatively affect the value of the BDC shares. Shares of BDCs frequently trade at a discount to their net asset value in the secondary market and the net asset value of a BDC’s shares may decrease.

				This trust invests in REITs and real estate companies. Many factors can have an impact on the performance of REITs and real estate companies, including cash available for distribution, the credit quality of a particular REIT, or the real estate industry in general. Risks associated with ownership of real estate include global and local economic conditions, decline in real estate values, changes in interest rates, and the strength or weakness of the real estate market.

				You will bear not only your share of the trust’s expenses, but also those of the underlying BDCs and REITs, which frequently have high expenses including but not limited to management fees and operational expenses. By investing in BDCs and REITs through the trust, investors incur greater expenses than they would incur if they invested directly in the BDCs and REITs.

				BDCs and REITs may invest in foreign securities which involves certain risks not typically associated with investing solely in the United States. This may magnify volatility due to changes in foreign exchange rates, the political and economic uncertainties in foreign countries, U.S. or foreign tax treatment, and the potential lack of liquidity, government supervision and regulation.

				BDCs may invest in securities of small and mid-cap companies. Securities of small and mid-cap companies are often more volatile than those of larger companies as a result of several factors such as limited trading volumes, products or financial resources, management inexperience and less publicly available information.

				BDCs and REITs may invest in fixed income securities. Fixed income securities are subject to various risks, including interest rate, credit, call, and quality risk. In general, the value of the fixed income securities will fall if interest rates rise. In a declining interest-rate environment, the portfolio may generate less income. A security issuer may be unable to make interest and/or principal payments in the future. Also, the longer the period to maturity, the greater the sensitivity to interest rate changes tends to be.

				BDCs may invest in high yield debt securities. High yield debt securities are generally below investment grade quality (“non-investment grade” debt). Investing in such debt should be viewed as speculative and you should review your ability to assume the risks associated with investments which utilize such debt. Non-investment grade debt is subject to numerous risks including higher interest rates, economic recession, deterioration of the non-investment grade debt markets, possible downgrades and payment defaults of interest and/or principal. Non-investment grade debt prices tend to fluctuate more than higher rated debt and are affected by short-term credit developments to a greater degree.

				BDCs and REITs operate in a highly competitive market for investment opportunities, and REITs and BDCs must raise additional capital to grow because they distribute most of their income.

				NOT FDIC INSURED - NOT BANK GUARANTEED - MAY LOSE VALUE

				Incapital Unit Trust, Series 104, is a unit investment trust that consists of multiple portfolios, including the Prospect Income Finance Portfolio, Series 4. Nuveen Securities, LLC serves as the Trust’s sponsor and Nuveen Fund Advisors, LLC serves as the Trust’s evaluator and supervisor.
				 
				Prospect Capital Management L.P. provides the Trust with portfolio consulting services. Prospect Capital Management L.P. is not affiliated with Nuveen, LLC. The Trust is distributed by Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, LLC. All marketing materials have been prepared by Nuveen. 






Trust Summary





Trust NameProspect Income Finance Portfolio, Series 4

Series NameSeries 4

Trust SymbolPIF0004

Nasdaq SymbolINPICX

Trust StatusSecondary

Initial Offer Date11/20/2015

Termination Date11/17/2017

First Income Record Date12/17/2015

Distibution FrequencyMonthly

Tax StructureRIC

Liquidation Price1$9.5203

Cash CUSIP45331R147

Reinvest CUSIP45331R154

Fee Cash CUSIP45331R162

Fee Reinvest CUSIP45331R170





1. Represents the value per unit that a unitholder would receive if the unitholder redeemed or sold units.  This price is equal to the net asset value per unit plus any remaining organization costs and creation & development fee.  This price reflects any remaining non-contingent deferred sales charges payable in connection with a liquidation of units.





















Investment Affiliates

Nuveen Asset Management
TIAA Investments
Symphony Asset Management
NWQ
Santa Barbara Asset Management
Winslow Capital


AGR Partners
Churchill Asset Management
GreenWood Resources
Gresham Investment Management
TH Real Estate
Westchester Agriculture Asset Management





Media Center
About Nuveen
Contact Us
Careers
Non-U.S. Investors
FINRA BrokerCheck




Follow Us:









Investing involves risk; principal loss is possible.  There is no assurance that a unit investment trust will achieve its investment objectives.  An investment in a unit investment trust is subject to market risk, which is the possibility that the market values of securities owned by the trust will decline and that the value of trust units may therefore be less than what you paid for them.  Accordingly, you can lose money investing in a trust.
NOT FDIC INSUREDMAY LOSE VALUENO BANK GUARANTEE







See our privacy policy, terms of use and our business continuity plan summary. The content of this site, including but not limited to the text and images herein and their arrangement are Copyright by Nuveen Investments. Securities offered through Nuveen Securities, LLC, a subsidiary of Nuveen, 333 W. Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL  60606.  Nuveen provides innovative investment strategies and portfolio management services through its independent investment affiliates: Nuveen Asset Management, TIAA Investments, Symphony Asset Management, NWQ Investment Management Company, Santa Barbara Asset Management, Winslow Capital Management, AGR Partners, Churchill Asset Management, GreenWood Resources Capital Management, Gresham Investment Management, TH Real Estate, and Westchester Agriculture Asset Management. 
Investor line: 1-800-257-8787. Advisor line: 1-800-752-8700.
The material contained on this website is not intended to be a recommendation or investment advice, does not constitute a solicitation to buy or sell securities, and is not provided in a fiduciary capacity. The information provided does not take into account the specific objectives or circumstances of any particular investor, or suggest any specific course of action. Investment decisions should be made based on an investor’s objectives and circumstances and in consultation with his or her advisors.
The information on this web site is intended for U.S. residents only.  If you are a non-U.S. resident, please visit www.nuveenglobal.com. The information provided does not constitute a solicitation of an offer to buy, or an offer to sell securities in any jurisdiction to any person to whom it is not lawful to make such an offer.






					

	189438-INV-AN-07/18


				












Login
Register
Client Accounts
Your Contacts







Not registered?
Register for access to investment team commentary, detailed portfolio information, and other advisor resources.  For instant access, register now.








Your Contacts
Our goal is to deliver lasting value to our clients. For assistance, please call or email our advisor service team or contact your personal Nuveen Service Team.
Log in to nuveen.com to access your personal Nuveen Service Team.



Financial Advisors
800-752-8700Email


Registered Investment Advisors
800-558-4487





Account Access
For more information on Mutual Fund Vision, FAN Mail, or accessing client accounts, please visit our advisor account access page.


Advisor Access

Vision
FAN Mail



Investor Access

Mutual Funds
Closed-End Funds






















	Nuveen Document


























Market Commentary | Video Library





This document is not available.







Nuveen Unit Investment Trust, Series 167, BizPedia.xyz - We monitor changes in companies





















BizPedia.xyz  - We monitor changes in companies
 






Nuveen Unit Investment Trust, Series 167


FREE EMAIL WATCHDOG
Get free email notifications about news in Nuveen Unit Investment Trust, Series 167.










The service is free and you can unsubscribe at any time.

General | Filings (5)
CIK Number: 0001677815

Nuveen Unit Investment Trust, Series 167 address333 WEST WACKER DRIVECHICAGO 60606
Earliest known filing
August 2016
Latest known filing
February 2017




Company filings
SEC filings are a great source of information for companies including investments, company events, and all sorts of other information. 
Nuveen Unit Investment Trust, Series 167 has 5 filings. View Nuveen Unit Investment Trust, Series 167 filings.
Similar companiesNuveen WCM Holdings, LLC, NUVEEN WASHINGTON PREMIUM INCOME MUNICIPAL FUND, NUVEEN VIRGINIA QUALITY MUNICIPAL INCOME FUND, NUVEEN VIRGINIA PREMIUM INCOME MUNICIPAL FUND 2, Nuveen Virginia Municipal Value Fund, NUVEEN VIRGINIA DIVIDEND ADVANTAGE MUNICIPAL FUND 3, NUVEEN VIRGINIA DIVIDEND ADVANTAGE MUNICIPAL FUND 2, NUVEEN VIRGINIA DIVIDEND ADVANTAGE MUNICIPAL FUND, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 99, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 98, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 97, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 96, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 95, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 94, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 93, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 92, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 91, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 90, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 9, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 89, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 88, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 87, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 86, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 85, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 84, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 83, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 82, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 81, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 80, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 8, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 79, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 78, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 77, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 76, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 75, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 74, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 73, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 72, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 71, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 70, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 7, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 69, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 68, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 67, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 66, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 65, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 64, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 63, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 62, NUVEEN UNIT TRUSTS SERIES 61














BizPedia.xyz collect news, financial information, SEC filings, stock information, contact information, personal information, information about investments, etc. about Nuveen Unit Investment Trust, Series 167. 









Incapital and Nuveen Investments Expand Unit Trust Partnership 









































































English
Français











Register
Sign In














Incapital and Nuveen Investments Expand Unit Trust Partnership




















June 10, 2015 08:30 ET

 | Source: Incapital LLC; Nuveen Investments







		New Unit Trusts Leverage Expertise of Nuveen's Multi-Affiliate Model

		Enhanced by Incapital Additions to Unit Trust Business

		Nuveen Expands Specialist Sales Support Team for Unit Trusts

CHICAGO, June 10, 2015 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Incapital LLC and Nuveen Investments, today announced the expansion of their joint-distribution and portfolio consultant unit trust partnership with the addition of new unit trusts and expanded sales resources at both firms to support the growth of the unit trust business and better serve the financial advisor community and their clients. Since the beginning of 2014, Nuveen and Incapital have partnered together on key aspects of unit trust product development, marketing, distribution and client relationship management. In this partnership, Incapital serves as trust underwriter and sponsor, providing units to the public through broker-dealers and other firms.  Nuveen Investments, through its several affiliates, serves as portfolio consultant responsible for developing investment strategies and constructing model portfolios for the unit trusts.

	Commenting on the partnership, John DesPrez, Incapital's Chief Executive Officer, said, "Incapital's relationship with Nuveen Investments continues to deepen. With the expansion of our joint-distribution agreement, we will be offering a wider range of investment strategies to thousands of additional financial advisors and their clients."

INCAPITAL UNIT TRUSTS FEATURING NUVEEN'S INVESTMENT EXPERTISE

	Since inception of the partnership, Incapital has offered five equity unit trust strategies that draw upon the deep and specialized expertise of Nuveen Investments' affiliates:


		Nuveen Equity Outlook Portfolios

		Nuveen Large Cap Dividend Portfolios

		Nuveen Core Real Estate Securities Portfolios

		Nuveen NWQ Global Dividend Value Portfolios

		Nuveen Tradewinds Global Energy Revolution Portfolio


	To further broaden its platform for clients, Incapital has been working closely with Nuveen this year to develop a robust pipeline of new unit trusts employing a variety of strategies and themes. Capitalizing on the recently closed Nuveen 2015 Equity Outlook Portfolio, Series 68, which more than doubled in assets from the prior year's series, Incapital filed an initial registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) for the Nuveen 2015 Mid-Year Equity Outlook Portfolio, Series 86. This new unit trust's portfolio selection is led by Bob Doll, Nuveen Asset Management's Senior Portfolio Manager and Chief Equity Strategist, and seeks to include a mid-year update in which Bob Doll reassesses his investment outlook as expressed in his 2015 Ten Predictions.

	Additionally, Incapital filed an initial registration statement with the SEC for the Nuveen Symphony Low Volatility Equity Portfolio, Series 88, which employs the investment expertise of Symphony Asset Management, an affiliate of Nuveen Investments. Recognized for their rigorous fundamental research and alternative investment/hedge fund expertise, Symphony applies a team-based approach to valuation and risk analysis, which seeks to identify and translate relative value into desired risk/reward portfolio outcomes. 

	Bill Adams, Nuveen Investments' Senior Executive Vice President and Head of Global Structured Products added, "We are very pleased to expand our relationship with Incapital as we work to bring innovative investment options to investors. We believe unit trusts can expand the ability of investors and their advisors to access the specialized investment expertise of our affiliates across a broad range of asset classes to help them better achieve their financial objectives." 

JOINT-DISTRIBUTION EFFORT

	Incapital has recently appointed Hugh McHaffie as Managing Director who will soon oversee the origination and distribution of a range of wealth management solutions, including Unit Trust, Market Linked and Annuity offerings. McHaffie is supported by a veteran Unit Trust origination team in Chicago, headed by John Browning, Managing Director and Randy Watts, Executive Director. Pat Dwyer, National Sales Manager, will soon lead Incapital's nation-wide distribution network supporting financial advisors seeking wealth management investment solutions for their clients.

	Given the performance of the current unit trust offerings, strong interest from the market, and robust pipeline of new offerings currently under consideration, Nuveen Investments is also enhancing its unit trust distribution efforts with the appointment of Melissa Roe as Managing Director, National Head of Unit Trust Sales. Overseeing a team of external and internal unit trust specialists, Roe will act as a liaison between Nuveen Investments and Incapital to represent the capabilities of Nuveen Investments' affiliates and ensure that the needs of financial advisors and their investor clients are being served. 

About Incapital

	Incapital was founded in 1999 and today is a leading underwriter and distributor of securities to more than 800 broker-dealers, institutions, asset managers, RIAs and banks. The firm represents more than 300 issuing entities and has a track record of over $400 billion in underwritten securities. Further information on Incapital is available at www.incapital.com. Further information on Incapital's Unit Trust Portfolios, including securities selection, fees, secondary market and other risk considerations is available on incapital.com.

About Nuveen Investments

	Nuveen Investments provides high-quality investment services designed to help secure the long-term goals of institutional and individual investors as well as the consultants and financial advisors who serve them. Nuveen Investments markets a wide range of specialized investment solutions which provide investors access to capabilities of its high-quality boutique investment affiliates—Nuveen Asset Management, LLC, Symphony Asset Management LLC, NWQ Investment Management Company, LLC, Santa Barbara Asset Management, LLC, Tradewinds Global Investors, LLC, Winslow Capital Management, LLC and Gresham Investment Management LLC, all of which are registered investment advisers and independent investment subsidiaries of Nuveen Investments, Inc. Nuveen Investments operates as a separate subsidiary within TIAA-CREF, which is a leading provider of retirement and financial services in the academic, research, medical and cultural fields. In total, Nuveen Investments managed approximately $233 billion as of March 31, 2015. For more information, please visit the Nuveen Investments website at www.nuveen.com.   

	Nuveen Investments, Inc. and its related entities named above are unaffiliated with Incapital LLC.

The information herein is not complete and is subject to change. We may not sell these securities until the registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission is effective. This notice is not an offer to sell these securities and is not soliciting an offer to buy these securities in any state or jurisdiction where the offer or sale is not permitted.

	There is no assurance that a unit investment trust will achieve its investment objective. An investment in this unit investment trust is subject to market risk, which is the possibility that the market values of securities owned by the trust will decline and that the value of trust units may therefore be less than what you paid for them. These unit investment trusts are unmanaged. You can lose money investing in unit investment trusts.  

Please consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the unit investment trust carefully before investing. The prospectus contains this and other information about this unit investment trust. To obtain a prospectus, please download a prospectus from sec.gov/edgar.shtml or the Unit Trust Offerings page on incapital.com. Please read the prospectus carefully before investing. Incapital LLC serves as the Sponsor to the Trusts. Incapital Unit Trust, Series 68, is a unit investment trust that consists of the Nuveen 2015 Equity Outlook Portfolio. Incapital Unit Trust, Series 86, is a unit investment trust that consists of the Nuveen 2015 Mid-Year Equity Outlook Portfolio.   Incapital Unit Trust, Series 88, is a unit investment trust that consists of the Nuveen Symphony Low Volatility Equity Portfolio.   

NOT FDIC INSURED | NOT BANK GUARANTEED | MAY LOSE VALUE

	©2015 Incapital. All rights reserved. Securities offered through and unit investment trusts sponsored by Incapital LLC, Member FINRA & SIPC, 200 South Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL 60606.    
MEDIA CONTACT
Incapital: Jim Schaberg
312-379-3752

MEDIA CONTACT
Nuveen Investments:  Kathleen Cardoza
312-917-7813



Related Articles
other press releases by Incapital LLC


Incapital and KKM Financial Launch Incapital Najarian Heat Seeker Portfolio
June 22, 2015 08:30


Financial Advisors Report Strong Client Interest in Values-Based Investing
September 30, 2014 12:57


Incapital Hires Larry Schechter to Join Capital Markets Team
September 03, 2014 08:45


Incapital Launches Farmer Mac Notes Program
July 21, 2014 13:12


Incapital Announces Appointment of Ken DiFrancesca to Annuities Team
June 23, 2014 12:33






122



other news releases in

Partnerships

in the last 30 days
                            











Profile

Incapital LLC





  Subscribe via RSS
 Subscribe via ATOM
 Javascript



  Boca Raton, Florida, UNITED STATES




Contact Data
MEDIA CONTACT
Incapital: Jim Schaberg
312-379-3752

MEDIA CONTACT
Nuveen Investments:  Kathleen Cardoza
312-917-7813







Media Files



Incapital LLC logo






LOGO URL | Copy the link below
            





Formats available:






                            Original
                        




                            Medium
                        




                            Small
                        









Nuveen Investments Logo






LOGO URL | Copy the link below
            





Formats available:






                            Original
                        




                            Medium
                        




                            Small
                        








Tags
BANKING














Newswire Distribution Network & Management



Home
Newsroom
RSS Feeds
Legal
Contact Us






About Us
GlobeNewswire, a Nasdaq company, is one of the world's largest newswire distribution networks, specializing in the delivery of corporate press releases financial disclosures and multimedia content to the media, investment community, individual investors and the general public.
            




Contact Us


Corporate Headquarters
2321 Rosecrans Avenue.
Suite 2200
El Segundo, CA 90245
Phone: (800) 307-6627
Fax:  (800) 307-3567
            


European Headquarters
Woolgate Exchange,
25 Basinghall Street,
London EC2V 5HA
UK
Phone: +1 866-465-8454




© 2017 GlobeNewswire, Inc. All Rights Reserved.


























 



 Incapital and Nuveen Asset Management Launch Equity Unit Trust Based on Bob Doll’s Predictions for 
         










    










 






 











 









Incapital and Nuveen Asset Management Launch Equity Unit Trust Based on Bob Doll's Predictions for 2015

		  Nuveen 2015 Equity Outlook Portfolio Will Leverage Predictions from Nuveen Asset Management Senior Portfolio Manager and Chief Equity Strategist Bob Doll
		

Jan 15, 2015, 09:00 ET
		  		  						
						 from   Incapital 











 
















































 

 















































 

 

 
 
 
 







With eight offices in the U.S. and Canada, Incapital (http://www.incapital.com) has established itself as one of the leading underwriters and distributors of a wide range of securities and investment products to broker-dealers, asset managers and ...    
 Facebook
 Twitter
 Pinterest

































 




 




With eight offices in the U.S. and Canada, Incapital (http://www.incapital.com) has established itself as one of the leading underwriters and distributors of a wide range of securities and investment products to broker-dealers, asset managers and institutional investors.
 


 

 




 





 


CHICAGO, Jan. 15, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- Incapital LLC and Nuveen Asset Management today announced that they have brought to market the next series of an equity unit trust based on the 2015 predictions of well-known Nuveen portfolio manager and strategist Bob Doll. This is the second consecutive year these two investment firms have partnered to bring such a portfolio to market.
The Nuveen 2015 Equity Outlook Portfolio, deposited on January 14, is designed to offer: 

The potential for capital appreciation for investors willing to accept associated equity market risks 
A high-conviction portfolio from an experienced portfolio manager and widely followed market strategist 
A portfolio approach seeking to limit uncompensated risk 
Investment opportunities not fully reflected in today's stock market valuations
More information about the Nuveen 2015 Equity Outlook Portfolio and other Incapital Unit Trusts is available at incapital.com/UnitTrusts.
Bob Doll, CFA, Senior Portfolio Manager and Chief Equity Strategist for Nuveen Asset Management, is a highly respected authority on the equity markets and regularly provides timely market perspectives to investors, advisors and the media.
The Nuveen 2015 Equity Outlook Portfolio is designed to capitalize on the economic and market environment described by Doll's 2015 Ten Predictions, released on January 7th. Incapital serves as the Trust's sponsor and Nuveen Asset Management serves as the Trust's portfolio consultant.
"We are pleased to partner again with Nuveen Asset Management to offer an equity trust product designed specifically for the upcoming market environment," said Phil Johnson, President of Incapital. "This partnership reflects our commitment to deliver diversified investment options to help investors meet their goals."
"Bob Doll's portfolio investment expertise, market insights, and Ten Predictions are highly respected and sought after in the investment community," said William T. Huffman, President of Nuveen Asset Management. "The Nuveen 2015 Equity Outlook Portfolio addresses the needs of investors seeking an equity trust option from an experienced portfolio manager and strategist, as well as two firms with a proven track record of innovative product development."  
The partnership between Incapital and Nuveen Asset Management and its affiliates, which kicked off at the end of 2013, has already resulted in the formation of four new unit trust strategies.
For media inquiries, please contact Kris Kagel, JCPR, at 973-850-7312 or kkagel@jcprinc.com.
About IncapitalIncapital LLC was founded in 1999 and today is a leading underwriter and distributor of securities to 800+ broker-dealers, institutions, asset managers, RIAs and banks. The firm represents 300+ issuing entities and has underwritten $350+ billion in securities.
About Nuveen Asset ManagementNuveen Asset Management, LLC offers multi-asset investment solutions, from traditional and specialized equity to taxable and municipal fixed income. As of September 30, 2014, Nuveen Asset Management had approximately $130 billion in assets under management.
There is no assurance that a unit investment trust will achieve its investment objective. An investment in this unit investment trust is subject to market risk, which is the possibility that the market values of securities owned by the trust will decline and that the value of trust units may therefore be less than what you paid for them. This trust is unmanaged. You can lose money investing in this trust. A portfolio concentrated in a single market sector may present more risk than a portfolio broadly diversified over several sectors.
Please consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the unit investment trust carefully before investing. The prospectus contains this and other information about this unit investment trust. To obtain a prospectus, please contact your financial advisor or download a prospectus from sec.gov/edgar.shtml. Please read the prospectus carefully before investing. Incapital Unit Trust, Series 68, is a unit investment trust that consists of the Nuveen 2015 Equity Outlook Portfolio. Incapital LLC serves as the Sponsor to the Trust.
Nuveen Asset Management, LLC is a registered investment adviser and subsidiary of Nuveen Investments, Inc. The Nuveen Asset Management, LLC name and logo are registered marks of Nuveen Investments, Inc. Incapital LLC and Nuveen Asset Management, LLC are unaffiliated. Nuveen Asset Management, LLC provides the trust with portfolio consulting services.
©2015 Incapital. All rights reserved. Securities offered through and unit investment trusts sponsored by Incapital LLC, Member FINRA & SIPC, 200 South Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL 60606.
Kris Kagel JCPR973-850-7312kkagel@jcprinc.com
Logo - http://photos.prnewswire.com/prnh/20141202/161815LOGO 
 SOURCE  Incapital  

RELATED LINKS
http://incapital.com



  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  
















Jan 16, 2015, 15:30 ET
Preview: Incapital Announces New Role for Laura Elliott




















Dec 08, 2014, 09:00 ET
Preview: Incapital Opens New York City Office to Strengthen Capital Markets, Credit Sales and Trading Divisions








My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 



	Incapital - Unit Trusts
















































































The link you have selected is located on another server. Please click the link below once more to proceed to the selected site. Incapital does not endorse this website, its sponsor, or any of the policies, activities, products, or services offered on the site or by any advertiser on the site.  


The link you have selected will redirect you to NuveenUIT.com since as of April 30, 2016 Nuveen Investments acquired Incapital’s unit trust platform. Please click the link below once more to proceed to the selected site. Incapital does not endorse this website, its sponsor, or any of the policies, activities, products, or services offered on the site or by any advertiser on the site.































Print





Nuveen Large Cap Dividend Portfolio



Strategy


Overview


Historical Pricing


Performance


Portfolio Holdings


Distributions









Featuring the
            investment expertise of  






An Equity Unit Trust Designed to Offer:

A portfolio of U.S. stocks selected for their combined dividend growth and total return potential
A large cap focus that may dampen volatility
Potential for above average dividend yield relative to the S&P 500® and Russell 1000® indices



The Case for Dividend Growers
Beyond their potential to provide attractive income, dividend growers and initiators—companies that have raised their dividends or initiated a new dividend—have historically realized higher returns with less risk than non-dividend payers and companies that have maintained their dividends over time.

The chart illustrates the average annualized historical performance of S&P 500® stocks, grouped as shown according to their dividend policies. The performance of each group is based on the equal-weighted geometric average of dividend paying and non-dividend paying historical S&P 500® stocks, rebalanced annually. The performance shown represents the risk-return characteristics of each of the categories. Each stock’s dividend policy is determined on a rolling 12-month basis. For example, a stock is classified as dividend paying if it paid a cash dividend at any time during the previous 12 months. Dividend growers and initiators include stocks that raised their existing dividend or initiated a new dividend during the preceding 12 months. Past performance does not guarantee future results. There is no assurance that any asset class or index will provide positive performance over time. Different benchmarks, economic periods, methodologies and market conditions will produce different results. It is not possible to invest directly in an index.
S&P 500® Index measures the performance of large capitalization U.S. stocks. The S&P 500® is a market weighted index of 500 stocks that are traded on the NYSE, NYSE MKT, and NASDAQ. “Standard & Poor’s®”, “S&P®” and “S&P 500®” are registered trademarks of Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC (“Standard & Poor’s”). The basket is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Standard & Poor’s and Standard & Poor’s does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in the securities. The Trust does not seek to match the performance or composition of the S&P 500® Index.
Why a Large Cap Dividend Growth Strategy Now?
Nuveen Asset Management believes:

Dividend growth stocks are undervalued
Large cap companies with relatively low payout ratios and strong cash flows are well positioned to outperform
Dividend growers may prove more defensive in rising rate environments



Investment Strategy
The Trust seeks to achieve its objective by purchasing large capitalization stocks that Nuveen Asset Management believes offer attractive dividend growth potential.


Portfolio Security Selection
Portfolio construction is led by Bob Doll, CFA, Senior Portfolio Manager and Chief Equity Strategist of Nuveen Asset Management. Bob Doll leverages Nuveen Asset Management’s proprietary equity investment process that combines quantitative techniques as well as fundamental research to recommend stocks for the Trust. 






Risk Considerations
There is no assurance that a unit investment trust will achieve its investment objective. An investment in this unit investment trust is subject to market risk, which is the possibility that the market values of securities owned by the trust will decline and that the value of trust units may therefore be less than what you paid for them. This trust is unmanaged. Accordingly, you can lose money investing in this trust.

Common stocks do not assure dividend payments. Dividends are paid only when declared by an issuer’s board of directors and the amount of any dividend may vary over time. There can be no guarantee dividend payments from securities held in the trust, if any, will increase or that dividend yield on securities in the trust will be greater than the yield of any index mentioned herein.

A portfolio concentrated in a single market sector may present more risk than a portfolio broadly diversified over several sectors. This trust is concentrated in the consumer products sectors. Some of the general risks of companies in the consumer products sectors include cyclicality of revenues and earnings, economic recession, currency fluctuations, changing consumer tastes, extensive competition, product liability litigation and increased government regulation.

Investing in foreign securities involves certain risks not typically associated with investing solely in the United States. This may magnify volatility due to changes in foreign exchange rates, the political and economic uncertainties in foreign countries, U.S. or foreign tax treatment, and the potential lack of liquidity, government supervision and regulation.

Although this trust’s life is approximately 15 months, this strategy should be considered as part of a long-term investment strategy and investors should consider their ability to pursue investing in successive portfolios at the applicable sales charge, if available. There may be tax consequences associated with an investment from one series to the next unless units are purchased in an IRA or other qualified tax-deferred account. Investors should consult their tax advisor or attorney to determine tax consequences associated with an investment from one portfolio to the next.

NOT FDIC INSURED - NOT BANK GUARANTEED - MAY LOSE VALUE

Please consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the unit investment trust carefully before investing. The prospectus contains this and other information about this unit investment trust. To obtain a prospectus, please download a prospectus from sec.gov/edgar.shtml or the Unit Trust Offerings page. Please read the prospectus carefully before investing.

Incapital Unit Trust, Series 52, is a unit investment trust that consists of the Nuveen Large Cap Dividend Portfolio, 3Q 2014. Incapital LLC serves as the Sponsor to the Trust.

Nuveen Asset Management, LLC is a registered investment advisor and wholly owned subsidiary of Nuveen Investments. The Nuveen name and logo are registered marks of Nuveen Investments. Incapital LLC and Nuveen Asset Management, LLC are unaffiliated. Nuveen Asset Management, LLC provides the trust with portfolio consulting services.

The S&P 500® is a market weighted index of 500 stocks that are traded on the NYSE, NYSE MKT, and NASDAQ. “Standard & Poor’s®”, “S&P®” and “S&P 500®” are registered trademarks of Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC (“Standard & Poor’s”). The trust is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Standard & Poor’s and Standard & Poor’s does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in the securities. The Trust does not seek to match the performance or composition of the S&P 500® Index.

The “Russell 1000® Index” and all other Russell index names are registered trademarks of Russell Investment Group. The portfolio is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Russell Investment Group and Russell Investment Group does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in the securities.
    


Investment Objective

        The Nuveen Large Cap Dividend Portfolio is a unit trust that seeks to provide total return from capital appreciation and dividend income. There is no assurance the objective will be met.

Investment Strategy
Portfolio Security Selection:
Portfolio construction is led by Bob Doll, CFA, of Nuveen Asset Management. Bob Doll leverages Nuveen Asset
Management’s proprietary equity investment process that combines quantitative
techniques as well as fundamental research to recommend stocks for the Trust.
Universe – Russell 1000® Index, composed of
approximately 1000 large cap stocks.
Quantitative Analysis – A multi-factor quantitative model evaluates each stock's valuation, growth history, profitability, balance sheet strength, and capital deployment to narrow the opportunity set.
Fundamental Ranking Process – The remaining stocks are ranked on a scale of 1 to 5
(with 1 being most attractive and 5 being least attractive) using fundamental research and analysis. Stocks rated 4 or 5 are excluded from portfolio consideration.
Portfolio Construction – From the remaining pool, Bob Doll recommends a portfolio that he believes is positioned for attractive total return, dividend growth potential and strong cash flow over the 15 month investment horizon of the trust. Risk/return frameworks are systematically utilized to limit perceived risks.
Portfolio – 25 approximately equally weighted large cap stocks across diverse sectors.

Sales Charge Discounts



Breakpoint
                        
Purchase Minimum
                        
Purchase Maximum
                        
Sales Charge
                        





                    Offer
                

                    $0.00
                

                    $49,999.99
                

                    2.950%
                



                    BP 1
                

                    $50,000.00
                

                    $99,999.99
                

                    2.700%
                



                    BP 2
                

                    $100,000.00
                

                    $249,999.99
                

                    2.450%
                



                    BP 3
                

                    $250,000.00
                

                    $499,999.99
                

                    2.200%
                



                    BP 4
                

                    $500,000.00
                

                    $999,999.99
                

                    1.950%
                



                    BP 5
                

                    $1,000,000.00+
                



                    1.400%
                



                    Swap/Roll
                





                    1.950%
                



The sales charge discounts are also applied on a unit basis using a breakpoint equivalent of $10 per unit and are applied on whichever basis is more favorable to the investor. These discounts are only available during the initial offering period. Please see the prospectus for details regarding sales charge discounts including all available discounts.

Sales Charges (based on $10.00)



Maximum Sales Charge
                

                    2.950%
                


Upfront Sales Charge
                

                    1.000%
                


Deferred Sales Charge
                

                    1.450%
                


Creation and Dev. Fee
                

                    0.500%
                



The table above shows the initial offering period sales charges. Percentages are based on a $10.00 per unit offering price. For unit prices other than $10.00, percentages of initial sales charge, creation and development fee, and deferred sales charge will vary. The maximum sales charge is comprised of the initial sales charge, creation and development fee and deferred sales charge. The Trust is also subject to annual operating expenses and organization costs, which are not included in the sales charges. The creation and development fee is a charge of $0.05 per unit collected at the end of the initial offering period. If the price you pay exceeds $10.00 per unit, the creation and development fee will be less than 0.50%; if the price you pay is less than $10.00 per unit, the creation and development fee will exceed 0.50%. Investors will not be assessed the initial and deferred sales charge for eligible fee-based accounts and must purchase units utilizing a Fee CUSIP. Please see the prospectus for sales charge details.


Risk Considerations
There is no assurance that a unit investment trust will achieve its investment objective. An investment in this unit investment trust is subject to market risk, which is the possibility that the market values of securities owned by the trust will decline and that the value of trust units may therefore be less than what you paid for them. This trust is unmanaged. Accordingly, you can lose money investing in this trust.

Common stocks do not assure dividend payments. Dividends are paid only when declared by an issuer’s board of directors and the amount of any dividend may vary over time. There can be no guarantee dividend payments from securities held in the trust, if any, will increase or that dividend yield on securities in the trust will be greater than the yield of any index mentioned herein.

A portfolio concentrated in a single market sector may present more risk than a portfolio broadly diversified over several sectors. This trust is concentrated in the consumer products sectors. Some of the general risks of companies in the consumer products sectors include cyclicality of revenues and earnings, economic recession, currency fluctuations, changing consumer tastes, extensive competition, product liability litigation and increased government regulation.

Investing in foreign securities involves certain risks not typically associated with investing solely in the United States. This may magnify volatility due to changes in foreign exchange rates, the political and economic uncertainties in foreign countries, U.S. or foreign tax treatment, and the potential lack of liquidity, government supervision and regulation.

Although this trust’s life is approximately 15 months, this strategy should be considered as part of a long-term investment strategy and investors should consider their ability to pursue investing in successive portfolios at the applicable sales charge, if available. There may be tax consequences associated with an investment from one series to the next unless units are purchased in an IRA or other qualified tax-deferred account. Investors should consult their tax advisor or attorney to determine tax consequences associated with an investment from one portfolio to the next.

NOT FDIC INSURED - NOT BANK GUARANTEED - MAY LOSE VALUE

Please consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the unit investment trust carefully before investing. The prospectus contains this and other information about this unit investment trust. To obtain a prospectus, please download a prospectus from sec.gov/edgar.shtml or the Unit Trust Offerings page. Please read the prospectus carefully before investing.

Incapital Unit Trust, Series 52, is a unit investment trust that consists of the Nuveen Large Cap Dividend Portfolio, 3Q 2014. Incapital LLC serves as the Sponsor to the Trust.

Nuveen Asset Management, LLC is a registered investment advisor and wholly owned subsidiary of Nuveen Investments. The Nuveen name and logo are registered marks of Nuveen Investments. Incapital LLC and Nuveen Asset Management, LLC are unaffiliated. Nuveen Asset Management, LLC provides the trust with portfolio consulting services.

The S&P 500® is a market weighted index of 500 stocks that are traded on the NYSE, NYSE MKT, and NASDAQ. “Standard & Poor’s®”, “S&P®” and “S&P 500®” are registered trademarks of Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC (“Standard & Poor’s”). The trust is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Standard & Poor’s and Standard & Poor’s does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in the securities. The Trust does not seek to match the performance or composition of the S&P 500® Index.

The “Russell 1000® Index” and all other Russell index names are registered trademarks of Russell Investment Group. The portfolio is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Russell Investment Group and Russell Investment Group does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in the securities.
    






Pricing Chart

Compare LIQ against key index:


NDX
INDU
SPX















































































































































































































































































































































Pricing



LIQ
                            

                                $10.0441
                            


Prev LIQ
                            

                                $10.0011
                            


LIQ Change
                            

0.43% $0.0430







Historical Highs/Lows*



 
                            
Price
                            
Date
                            




LIQ High:
                            

                                $10.5649
                            

                                2/24/2015
                            


LIQ Low:
                            

                                $9.1322
                            

                                9/28/2015
                            





                        *Trade dates 7/17/2014 to 10/16/2015
                    







Export to Excel






Product Price History



Month:
                                
July
August
September
October
November
December
January
February
March
April
May
June

Year:
                                
2014
2015















Date
                                        
LIQ
                                        





                                    07/17/14
                                

                                    $9.7550
                                



                                    07/18/14
                                

                                    $9.8367
                                



                                    07/21/14
                                

                                    $9.8154
                                



                                    07/22/14
                                

                                    $9.8551
                                



                                    07/23/14
                                

                                    $9.8632
                                



                                    07/24/14
                                

                                    $9.8697
                                



                                    07/25/14
                                

                                    $9.8574
                                



                                    07/28/14
                                

                                    $9.8726
                                



                                    07/29/14
                                

                                    $9.8667
                                



                                    07/30/14
                                

                                    $9.8426
                                



                                    07/31/14
                                

                                    $9.6850
                                



                                    08/01/14
                                

                                    $9.6537
                                



                                    08/04/14
                                

                                    $9.7332
                                



                                    08/05/14
                                

                                    $9.6573
                                



                                    08/06/14
                                

                                    $9.6422
                                



                                    08/07/14
                                

                                    $9.5847
                                



                                    08/08/14
                                

                                    $9.7163
                                



                                    08/11/14
                                

                                    $9.7369
                                



                                    08/12/14
                                

                                    $9.7354
                                



                                    08/13/14
                                

                                    $9.7795
                                



                                    08/14/14
                                

                                    $9.8475
                                



                                    08/15/14
                                

                                    $9.8288
                                



                                    08/18/14
                                

                                    $9.9021
                                



                                    08/19/14
                                

                                    $9.9608
                                



                                    08/20/14
                                

                                    $10.0003
                                



                                    08/21/14
                                

                                    $10.0389
                                



                                    08/22/14
                                

                                    $10.0222
                                



                                    08/25/14
                                

                                    $10.0813
                                



                                    08/26/14
                                

                                    $10.0970
                                



                                    08/27/14
                                

                                    $10.1249
                                



                                    08/28/14
                                

                                    $10.1300
                                



                                    08/29/14
                                

                                    $10.1538
                                



                                    09/02/14
                                

                                    $10.1105
                                



                                    09/03/14
                                

                                    $10.1149
                                



                                    09/04/14
                                

                                    $10.1028
                                



                                    09/05/14
                                

                                    $10.1400
                                



                                    09/08/14
                                

                                    $10.0828
                                



                                    09/09/14
                                

                                    $10.0321
                                



                                    09/10/14
                                

                                    $10.0395
                                



                                    09/11/14
                                

                                    $10.0570
                                



                                    09/12/14
                                

                                    $9.9860
                                



                                    09/15/14
                                

                                    $10.0122
                                



                                    09/16/14
                                

                                    $10.0685
                                



                                    09/17/14
                                

                                    $10.1155
                                



                                    09/18/14
                                

                                    $10.1675
                                



                                    09/19/14
                                

                                    $10.1918
                                



                                    09/22/14
                                

                                    $10.1079
                                



                                    09/23/14
                                

                                    $10.0071
                                



                                    09/24/14
                                

                                    $10.1042
                                



                                    09/25/14
                                

                                    $9.9704
                                



                                    09/26/14
                                

                                    $10.0778
                                



                                    09/29/14
                                

                                    $10.0179
                                



                                    09/30/14
                                

                                    $9.9878
                                



                                    10/01/14
                                

                                    $9.8267
                                



                                    10/02/14
                                

                                    $9.8007
                                



                                    10/03/14
                                

                                    $9.8964
                                



                                    10/06/14
                                

                                    $9.8918
                                



                                    10/07/14
                                

                                    $9.7215
                                



                                    10/08/14
                                

                                    $9.8914
                                



                                    10/09/14
                                

                                    $9.6805
                                



                                    10/10/14
                                

                                    $9.6172
                                



                                    10/13/14
                                

                                    $9.3970
                                



                                    10/14/14
                                

                                    $9.4053
                                



                                    10/15/14
                                

                                    $9.3301
                                



                                    10/16/14
                                

                                    $9.4184
                                



                                    10/17/14
                                

                                    $9.4481
                                



                                    10/20/14
                                

                                    $9.5324
                                



                                    10/21/14
                                

                                    $9.7237
                                



                                    10/22/14
                                

                                    $9.6436
                                



                                    10/23/14
                                

                                    $9.7461
                                



                                    10/24/14
                                

                                    $9.7713
                                



                                    10/27/14
                                

                                    $9.7356
                                



                                    10/28/14
                                

                                    $9.8704
                                



                                    10/29/14
                                

                                    $9.8747
                                



                                    10/30/14
                                

                                    $9.9499
                                



                                    10/31/14
                                

                                    $10.0376
                                



                                    11/03/14
                                

                                    $10.0059
                                



                                    11/04/14
                                

                                    $9.9620
                                



                                    11/05/14
                                

                                    $9.9841
                                



                                    11/06/14
                                

                                    $10.0034
                                



                                    11/07/14
                                

                                    $10.0145
                                



                                    11/10/14
                                

                                    $10.0503
                                



                                    11/11/14
                                

                                    $10.0701
                                



                                    11/12/14
                                

                                    $10.1066
                                



                                    11/13/14
                                

                                    $10.1366
                                



                                    11/14/14
                                

                                    $10.1390
                                



                                    11/17/14
                                

                                    $10.1565
                                



                                    11/18/14
                                

                                    $10.2096
                                



                                    11/19/14
                                

                                    $10.1820
                                



                                    11/20/14
                                

                                    $10.2007
                                



                                    11/21/14
                                

                                    $10.2785
                                



                                    11/24/14
                                

                                    $10.2884
                                



                                    11/25/14
                                

                                    $10.2657
                                



                                    11/26/14
                                

                                    $10.3218
                                



                                    11/28/14
                                

                                    $10.2364
                                



                                    12/01/14
                                

                                    $10.1762
                                



                                    12/02/14
                                

                                    $10.2214
                                



                                    12/03/14
                                

                                    $10.2505
                                



                                    12/04/14
                                

                                    $10.2297
                                



                                    12/05/14
                                

                                    $10.2492
                                



                                    12/08/14
                                

                                    $10.0728
                                



                                    12/09/14
                                

                                    $10.0364
                                



                                    12/10/14
                                

                                    $9.8384
                                



                                    12/11/14
                                

                                    $9.8917
                                



                                    12/12/14
                                

                                    $9.7131
                                



                                    12/15/14
                                

                                    $9.6505
                                



                                    12/16/14
                                

                                    $9.5963
                                



                                    12/17/14
                                

                                    $9.7624
                                



                                    12/18/14
                                

                                    $10.0100
                                



                                    12/19/14
                                

                                    $10.0693
                                



                                    12/22/14
                                

                                    $10.1261
                                



                                    12/23/14
                                

                                    $10.1609
                                



                                    12/24/14
                                

                                    $10.1614
                                



                                    12/26/14
                                

                                    $10.1934
                                



                                    12/29/14
                                

                                    $10.1861
                                



                                    12/30/14
                                

                                    $10.1473
                                



                                    12/31/14
                                

                                    $10.0375
                                



                                    01/02/15
                                

                                    $10.0272
                                



                                    01/05/15
                                

                                    $9.8285
                                



                                    01/06/15
                                

                                    $9.7557
                                



                                    01/07/15
                                

                                    $9.9104
                                



                                    01/08/15
                                

                                    $10.1128
                                



                                    01/09/15
                                

                                    $10.0407
                                



                                    01/12/15
                                

                                    $9.9772
                                



                                    01/13/15
                                

                                    $9.9440
                                



                                    01/14/15
                                

                                    $9.9016
                                



                                    01/15/15
                                

                                    $9.8494
                                



                                    01/16/15
                                

                                    $9.9963
                                



                                    01/20/15
                                

                                    $10.0166
                                



                                    01/21/15
                                

                                    $10.0857
                                



                                    01/22/15
                                

                                    $10.2322
                                



                                    01/23/15
                                

                                    $10.1643
                                



                                    01/26/15
                                

                                    $10.1705
                                



                                    01/27/15
                                

                                    $9.9994
                                



                                    01/28/15
                                

                                    $9.8925
                                



                                    01/29/15
                                

                                    $10.0214
                                



                                    01/30/15
                                

                                    $9.8623
                                



                                    02/02/15
                                

                                    $10.0049
                                



                                    02/03/15
                                

                                    $10.2110
                                



                                    02/04/15
                                

                                    $10.1923
                                



                                    02/05/15
                                

                                    $10.2600
                                



                                    02/06/15
                                

                                    $10.2536
                                



                                    02/09/15
                                

                                    $10.2370
                                



                                    02/10/15
                                

                                    $10.3601
                                



                                    02/11/15
                                

                                    $10.3828
                                



                                    02/12/15
                                

                                    $10.4738
                                



                                    02/13/15
                                

                                    $10.4904
                                



                                    02/17/15
                                

                                    $10.4816
                                



                                    02/18/15
                                

                                    $10.4636
                                



                                    02/19/15
                                

                                    $10.4889
                                



                                    02/20/15
                                

                                    $10.5533
                                



                                    02/23/15
                                

                                    $10.5556
                                



                                    02/24/15
                                

                                    $10.5649
                                



                                    02/25/15
                                

                                    $10.5127
                                



                                    02/26/15
                                

                                    $10.4685
                                



                                    02/27/15
                                

                                    $10.4491
                                



                                    03/02/15
                                

                                    $10.5067
                                



                                    03/03/15
                                

                                    $10.4493
                                



                                    03/04/15
                                

                                    $10.3961
                                



                                    03/05/15
                                

                                    $10.3789
                                



                                    03/06/15
                                

                                    $10.1437
                                



                                    03/09/15
                                

                                    $10.1823
                                



                                    03/10/15
                                

                                    $10.0305
                                



                                    03/11/15
                                

                                    $10.0014
                                



                                    03/12/15
                                

                                    $10.1096
                                



                                    03/13/15
                                

                                    $10.0446
                                



                                    03/16/15
                                

                                    $10.1991
                                



                                    03/17/15
                                

                                    $10.1533
                                



                                    03/18/15
                                

                                    $10.2956
                                



                                    03/19/15
                                

                                    $10.2547
                                



                                    03/20/15
                                

                                    $10.3386
                                



                                    03/23/15
                                

                                    $10.3263
                                



                                    03/24/15
                                

                                    $10.2749
                                



                                    03/25/15
                                

                                    $10.1216
                                



                                    03/26/15
                                

                                    $10.1030
                                



                                    03/27/15
                                

                                    $10.1386
                                



                                    03/30/15
                                

                                    $10.2611
                                



                                    03/31/15
                                

                                    $10.1618
                                



                                    04/01/15
                                

                                    $10.1447
                                



                                    04/02/15
                                

                                    $10.1946
                                



                                    04/06/15
                                

                                    $10.2728
                                



                                    04/07/15
                                

                                    $10.2526
                                



                                    04/08/15
                                

                                    $10.3004
                                



                                    04/09/15
                                

                                    $10.3326
                                



                                    04/10/15
                                

                                    $10.4018
                                



                                    04/13/15
                                

                                    $10.3336
                                



                                    04/14/15
                                

                                    $10.3446
                                



                                    04/15/15
                                

                                    $10.4035
                                



                                    04/16/15
                                

                                    $10.4348
                                



                                    04/17/15
                                

                                    $10.3140
                                



                                    04/20/15
                                

                                    $10.4219
                                



                                    04/21/15
                                

                                    $10.4041
                                



                                    04/22/15
                                

                                    $10.4357
                                



                                    04/23/15
                                

                                    $10.4638
                                



                                    04/24/15
                                

                                    $10.4885
                                



                                    04/27/15
                                

                                    $10.4141
                                



                                    04/28/15
                                

                                    $10.4728
                                



                                    04/29/15
                                

                                    $10.3779
                                



                                    04/30/15
                                

                                    $10.2711
                                



                                    05/01/15
                                

                                    $10.3664
                                



                                    05/04/15
                                

                                    $10.3773
                                



                                    05/05/15
                                

                                    $10.2435
                                



                                    05/06/15
                                

                                    $10.1971
                                



                                    05/07/15
                                

                                    $10.2232
                                



                                    05/08/15
                                

                                    $10.3864
                                



                                    05/11/15
                                

                                    $10.3436
                                



                                    05/12/15
                                

                                    $10.3090
                                



                                    05/13/15
                                

                                    $10.3014
                                



                                    05/14/15
                                

                                    $10.4183
                                



                                    05/15/15
                                

                                    $10.4477
                                



                                    05/18/15
                                

                                    $10.4544
                                



                                    05/19/15
                                

                                    $10.4205
                                



                                    05/20/15
                                

                                    $10.4288
                                



                                    05/21/15
                                

                                    $10.4682
                                



                                    05/22/15
                                

                                    $10.4215
                                



                                    05/26/15
                                

                                    $10.2958
                                



                                    05/27/15
                                

                                    $10.3684
                                



                                    05/28/15
                                

                                    $10.3671
                                



                                    05/29/15
                                

                                    $10.3024
                                



                                    06/01/15
                                

                                    $10.3182
                                



                                    06/02/15
                                

                                    $10.3243
                                



                                    06/03/15
                                

                                    $10.3517
                                



                                    06/04/15
                                

                                    $10.2633
                                



                                    06/05/15
                                

                                    $10.1930
                                



                                    06/08/15
                                

                                    $10.0796
                                



                                    06/09/15
                                

                                    $10.0780
                                



                                    06/10/15
                                

                                    $10.1803
                                



                                    06/11/15
                                

                                    $10.2438
                                



                                    06/12/15
                                

                                    $10.1830
                                



                                    06/15/15
                                

                                    $10.1228
                                



                                    06/16/15
                                

                                    $10.1705
                                



                                    06/17/15
                                

                                    $10.2103
                                



                                    06/18/15
                                

                                    $10.3244
                                



                                    06/19/15
                                

                                    $10.2775
                                



                                    06/22/15
                                

                                    $10.3037
                                



                                    06/23/15
                                

                                    $10.3106
                                



                                    06/24/15
                                

                                    $10.2325
                                



                                    06/25/15
                                

                                    $10.1968
                                



                                    06/26/15
                                

                                    $10.1869
                                



                                    06/29/15
                                

                                    $9.9803
                                



                                    06/30/15
                                

                                    $10.0195
                                



                                    07/01/15
                                

                                    $10.0848
                                



                                    07/02/15
                                

                                    $10.0528
                                



                                    07/06/15
                                

                                    $10.0357
                                



                                    07/07/15
                                

                                    $10.1326
                                



                                    07/08/15
                                

                                    $9.9713
                                



                                    07/09/15
                                

                                    $9.9994
                                



                                    07/10/15
                                

                                    $10.1198
                                



                                    07/13/15
                                

                                    $10.2411
                                



                                    07/14/15
                                

                                    $10.2991
                                



                                    07/15/15
                                

                                    $10.2897
                                



                                    07/16/15
                                

                                    $10.3821
                                



                                    07/17/15
                                

                                    $10.3382
                                



                                    07/20/15
                                

                                    $10.3334
                                



                                    07/21/15
                                

                                    $10.2644
                                



                                    07/22/15
                                

                                    $10.2345
                                



                                    07/23/15
                                

                                    $10.2138
                                



                                    07/24/15
                                

                                    $10.0762
                                



                                    07/27/15
                                

                                    $10.0471
                                



                                    07/28/15
                                

                                    $10.1934
                                



                                    07/29/15
                                

                                    $10.3013
                                



                                    07/30/15
                                

                                    $10.3218
                                



                                    07/31/15
                                

                                    $10.3358
                                



                                    08/03/15
                                

                                    $10.2916
                                



                                    08/04/15
                                

                                    $10.2979
                                



                                    08/05/15
                                

                                    $10.3662
                                



                                    08/06/15
                                

                                    $10.2805
                                



                                    08/07/15
                                

                                    $10.2430
                                



                                    08/10/15
                                

                                    $10.3849
                                



                                    08/11/15
                                

                                    $10.2861
                                



                                    08/12/15
                                

                                    $10.2701
                                



                                    08/13/15
                                

                                    $10.2363
                                



                                    08/14/15
                                

                                    $10.2588
                                



                                    08/17/15
                                

                                    $10.3005
                                



                                    08/18/15
                                

                                    $10.2998
                                



                                    08/19/15
                                

                                    $10.2054
                                



                                    08/20/15
                                

                                    $10.0211
                                



                                    08/21/15
                                

                                    $9.7334
                                



                                    08/24/15
                                

                                    $9.3263
                                



                                    08/25/15
                                

                                    $9.1910
                                



                                    08/26/15
                                

                                    $9.5083
                                



                                    08/27/15
                                

                                    $9.7302
                                



                                    08/28/15
                                

                                    $9.7504
                                



                                    08/31/15
                                

                                    $9.6800
                                



                                    09/01/15
                                

                                    $9.4280
                                



                                    09/02/15
                                

                                    $9.6219
                                



                                    09/03/15
                                

                                    $9.6500
                                



                                    09/04/15
                                

                                    $9.4844
                                



                                    09/08/15
                                

                                    $9.6627
                                



                                    09/09/15
                                

                                    $9.5506
                                



                                    09/10/15
                                

                                    $9.5846
                                



                                    09/11/15
                                

                                    $9.6135
                                



                                    09/14/15
                                

                                    $9.5456
                                



                                    09/15/15
                                

                                    $9.6708
                                



                                    09/16/15
                                

                                    $9.7697
                                



                                    09/17/15
                                

                                    $9.7368
                                



                                    09/18/15
                                

                                    $9.5718
                                



                                    09/21/15
                                

                                    $9.6088
                                



                                    09/22/15
                                

                                    $9.4880
                                



                                    09/23/15
                                

                                    $9.4364
                                



                                    09/24/15
                                

                                    $9.3989
                                



                                    09/25/15
                                

                                    $9.3627
                                



                                    09/28/15
                                

                                    $9.1322
                                



                                    09/29/15
                                

                                    $9.1565
                                



                                    09/30/15
                                

                                    $9.3355
                                



                                    10/01/15
                                

                                    $9.3495
                                



                                    10/02/15
                                

                                    $9.5061
                                



                                    10/05/15
                                

                                    $9.7138
                                



                                    10/06/15
                                

                                    $9.7163
                                



                                    10/07/15
                                

                                    $9.8318
                                



                                    10/08/15
                                

                                    $9.9575
                                



                                    10/09/15
                                

                                    $9.9628
                                



                                    10/12/15
                                

                                    $9.9789
                                



                                    10/13/15
                                

                                    $9.9318
                                



                                    10/14/15
                                

                                    $9.8999
                                



                                    10/15/15
                                

                                    $10.0011
                                



                                    10/16/15
                                

                                    $10.0441
                                






Export to Excel






LIQ is the Liquidation Price.  Represents the value per unit that a unitholder would receive if the unitholder redeemed or sold units.  This price is equal to the net asset value per unit plus any remaining organization costs and creation & development fee.  This price reflects any remaining non-contingent deferred sales charges payable in connection with a liquidation of units.
Past performance is no indication of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate with changes in market conditions. Units when redeemed may be worth more or less than their original cost. 
This page contains historical pricing or historical distributions information for the unit investment trust listed above. It should not be used for federal or state tax purposes, please contact your financial advisor for tax information.




Risk Considerations
There is no assurance that a unit investment trust will achieve its investment objective. An investment in this unit investment trust is subject to market risk, which is the possibility that the market values of securities owned by the trust will decline and that the value of trust units may therefore be less than what you paid for them. This trust is unmanaged. Accordingly, you can lose money investing in this trust.

Common stocks do not assure dividend payments. Dividends are paid only when declared by an issuer’s board of directors and the amount of any dividend may vary over time. There can be no guarantee dividend payments from securities held in the trust, if any, will increase or that dividend yield on securities in the trust will be greater than the yield of any index mentioned herein.

A portfolio concentrated in a single market sector may present more risk than a portfolio broadly diversified over several sectors. This trust is concentrated in the consumer products sectors. Some of the general risks of companies in the consumer products sectors include cyclicality of revenues and earnings, economic recession, currency fluctuations, changing consumer tastes, extensive competition, product liability litigation and increased government regulation.

Investing in foreign securities involves certain risks not typically associated with investing solely in the United States. This may magnify volatility due to changes in foreign exchange rates, the political and economic uncertainties in foreign countries, U.S. or foreign tax treatment, and the potential lack of liquidity, government supervision and regulation.

Although this trust’s life is approximately 15 months, this strategy should be considered as part of a long-term investment strategy and investors should consider their ability to pursue investing in successive portfolios at the applicable sales charge, if available. There may be tax consequences associated with an investment from one series to the next unless units are purchased in an IRA or other qualified tax-deferred account. Investors should consult their tax advisor or attorney to determine tax consequences associated with an investment from one portfolio to the next.

NOT FDIC INSURED - NOT BANK GUARANTEED - MAY LOSE VALUE

Please consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the unit investment trust carefully before investing. The prospectus contains this and other information about this unit investment trust. To obtain a prospectus, please download a prospectus from sec.gov/edgar.shtml or the Unit Trust Offerings page. Please read the prospectus carefully before investing.

Incapital Unit Trust, Series 52, is a unit investment trust that consists of the Nuveen Large Cap Dividend Portfolio, 3Q 2014. Incapital LLC serves as the Sponsor to the Trust.

Nuveen Asset Management, LLC is a registered investment advisor and wholly owned subsidiary of Nuveen Investments. The Nuveen name and logo are registered marks of Nuveen Investments. Incapital LLC and Nuveen Asset Management, LLC are unaffiliated. Nuveen Asset Management, LLC provides the trust with portfolio consulting services.

The S&P 500® is a market weighted index of 500 stocks that are traded on the NYSE, NYSE MKT, and NASDAQ. “Standard & Poor’s®”, “S&P®” and “S&P 500®” are registered trademarks of Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC (“Standard & Poor’s”). The trust is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Standard & Poor’s and Standard & Poor’s does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in the securities. The Trust does not seek to match the performance or composition of the S&P 500® Index.

The “Russell 1000® Index” and all other Russell index names are registered trademarks of Russell Investment Group. The portfolio is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Russell Investment Group and Russell Investment Group does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in the securities.
    


Product Performance as of 10/16/2015




Cumulative Return
                




Year to
                    Date
                
Since
                    Deposit
                
3 Months
                
6 Months
                






Distributions Reinvested



With Transaction Sales Charge
                

                    -0.2942%
                

                    3.3057%
                

                    -4.8386%
                

                    -4.6619%
                



Without Transaction Sales Charge
                

                    2.2100%
                

                    5.9003%
                

                    -2.4491%
                

                    -2.2672%
                




Distributions in Cash



With Transaction Sales Charge
                

                    -0.3042%
                

                    3.3010%
                

                    -4.8822%
                

                    -4.6883%
                



Without Transaction Sales Charge
                

                    2.1998%
                

                    5.8954%
                

                    -2.4937%
                

                    -2.2942%
                




Returns With Transactional Sales Charge reflect the maximum transactional sales charge that would be payable by an investor upon sale or redemption of units at the end of the applicable period(s). The transactional sales charge includes any initial or deferred sales charges other than the creation and development fee. These returns do not reflect any creation and development fee prior to collection (generally the close of the initial offering period). Any creation and development fee is reflected in the returns as of the time of payment by a trust.

Returns Without Transactional Sales Charge do not reflect any transactional sales charge and do not reflect any creation and development fee prior to collection (generally the close of the initial offering period). Any creation and development fee is reflected in the returns as of the time of payment by a trust.
Returns are cumulative total returns (not annualized) unless labeled as average annual returns.  Distribution Received in Cash returns reflect trust expenses as incurred and assume income and principal distributions are paid out in cash on the payable date.  Distributions Reinvested returns reflect trust expenses as incurred and assume income and principal distributions are reinvested on the reinvestment date.

Past performance is no indication of future results. Investment return and principal value will fluctuate with changes in market conditions. Units when redeemed may be worth more or less than their original cost.

All returns are historical and do not represent potential future performance.  A trust’s performance, especially for short time periods, should not be the sole factor in making your investment decision.


Risk Considerations
There is no assurance that a unit investment trust will achieve its investment objective. An investment in this unit investment trust is subject to market risk, which is the possibility that the market values of securities owned by the trust will decline and that the value of trust units may therefore be less than what you paid for them. This trust is unmanaged. Accordingly, you can lose money investing in this trust.

Common stocks do not assure dividend payments. Dividends are paid only when declared by an issuer’s board of directors and the amount of any dividend may vary over time. There can be no guarantee dividend payments from securities held in the trust, if any, will increase or that dividend yield on securities in the trust will be greater than the yield of any index mentioned herein.

A portfolio concentrated in a single market sector may present more risk than a portfolio broadly diversified over several sectors. This trust is concentrated in the consumer products sectors. Some of the general risks of companies in the consumer products sectors include cyclicality of revenues and earnings, economic recession, currency fluctuations, changing consumer tastes, extensive competition, product liability litigation and increased government regulation.

Investing in foreign securities involves certain risks not typically associated with investing solely in the United States. This may magnify volatility due to changes in foreign exchange rates, the political and economic uncertainties in foreign countries, U.S. or foreign tax treatment, and the potential lack of liquidity, government supervision and regulation.

Although this trust’s life is approximately 15 months, this strategy should be considered as part of a long-term investment strategy and investors should consider their ability to pursue investing in successive portfolios at the applicable sales charge, if available. There may be tax consequences associated with an investment from one series to the next unless units are purchased in an IRA or other qualified tax-deferred account. Investors should consult their tax advisor or attorney to determine tax consequences associated with an investment from one portfolio to the next.

NOT FDIC INSURED - NOT BANK GUARANTEED - MAY LOSE VALUE

Please consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the unit investment trust carefully before investing. The prospectus contains this and other information about this unit investment trust. To obtain a prospectus, please download a prospectus from sec.gov/edgar.shtml or the Unit Trust Offerings page. Please read the prospectus carefully before investing.

Incapital Unit Trust, Series 52, is a unit investment trust that consists of the Nuveen Large Cap Dividend Portfolio, 3Q 2014. Incapital LLC serves as the Sponsor to the Trust.

Nuveen Asset Management, LLC is a registered investment advisor and wholly owned subsidiary of Nuveen Investments. The Nuveen name and logo are registered marks of Nuveen Investments. Incapital LLC and Nuveen Asset Management, LLC are unaffiliated. Nuveen Asset Management, LLC provides the trust with portfolio consulting services.

The S&P 500® is a market weighted index of 500 stocks that are traded on the NYSE, NYSE MKT, and NASDAQ. “Standard & Poor’s®”, “S&P®” and “S&P 500®” are registered trademarks of Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC (“Standard & Poor’s”). The trust is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Standard & Poor’s and Standard & Poor’s does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in the securities. The Trust does not seek to match the performance or composition of the S&P 500® Index.

The “Russell 1000® Index” and all other Russell index names are registered trademarks of Russell Investment Group. The portfolio is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Russell Investment Group and Russell Investment Group does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in the securities.
    








Asset Style
                                
Weight
                                





                            Large Cap Value
                        

                            51.99 %
                        



                            Large Cap Blend
                        

                            40.08 %
                        



                            Large Cap Growth
                        

                            7.93 %
                        









Asset Type
                                
Weight
                                





                            Equity
                        

                            100.00 %
                        











Sector Composition
                                
Weight
                                





                            Industrials
                        

                            20.02 %
                        



                            Consumer Discretionary
                        

                            15.90 %
                        



                            Health Care
                        

                            12.04 %
                        



                            Telecommunication Services
                        

                            12.02 %
                        



                            Consumer Staples
                        

                            12.02 %
                        



                            Materials
                        

                            11.99 %
                        



                            Energy
                        

                            8.02 %
                        



                            Information Technology
                        

                            7.99 %
                        









Country Composition
                                
Weight
                                





                            Domestic
                        

                            96.02 %
                        



                            Foreign
                        

                            3.98 %
                        








Portfolio Holdings



Name
                            
Symbol
                            
Sector
                            
Style
                            
Weight
                            





                        Amgen Inc.
                    

                        AMGN
                    

                        Health Care
                    

                        Large Cap Blend
                    

                        4.00 %
                    



                        The Boeing Company
                    

                        BA
                    

                        Industrials
                    

                        Large Cap Blend
                    

                        4.00 %
                    



                        Caterpillar Inc.
                    

                        CAT
                    

                        Industrials
                    

                        Large Cap Blend
                    

                        4.01 %
                    



                        CenturyLink Inc.
                    

                        CTL
                    

                        Telecommunication Services
                    

                        Large Cap Value
                    

                        4.01 %
                    



                        The Dow Chemical Company
                    

                        DOW
                    

                        Materials
                    

                        Large Cap Blend
                    

                        4.01 %
                    



                        Ford Motor Company
                    

                        F
                    

                        Consumer Discretionary
                    

                        Large Cap Value
                    

                        3.98 %
                    



                        The Home Depot, Inc.
                    

                        HD
                    

                        Consumer Discretionary
                    

                        Large Cap Growth
                    

                        3.98 %
                    



                        HEWLETT-PACKARD CO
                    

                        HPQ
                    

                        Information Technology
                    

                        Large Cap Value
                    

                        3.98 %
                    



                        INTERNATIONAL PAPER CO
                    

                        IP
                    

                        Materials
                    

                        Large Cap Blend
                    

                        4.00 %
                    



                        Lockheed Martin Corporation
                    

                        LMT
                    

                        Industrials
                    

                        Large Cap Value
                    

                        4.04 %
                    



                        Las Vegas Sands Corp.
                    

                        LVS
                    

                        Consumer Discretionary
                    

                        Large Cap Growth
                    

                        3.95 %
                    



                        LyondellBasell Industries NV
                    

                        LYB
                    

                        Materials
                    

                        Large Cap Value
                    

                        3.98 %
                    



                        Macy's, Inc.
                    

                        M
                    

                        Consumer Discretionary
                    

                        Large Cap Blend
                    

                        3.99 %
                    



                        Altria Group, Inc.
                    

                        MO
                    

                        Consumer Staples
                    

                        Large Cap Blend
                    

                        4.01 %
                    



                        Microsoft Corporation
                    

                        MSFT
                    

                        Information Technology
                    

                        Large Cap Blend
                    

                        4.01 %
                    



                        NORTHROP GRUMMAN CORP
                    

                        NOC
                    

                        Industrials
                    

                        Large Cap Value
                    

                        4.00 %
                    



                        OCCIDENTAL PETROLEUM CORP
                    

                        OXY
                    

                        Energy
                    

                        Large Cap Value
                    

                        4.02 %
                    



                        PepsiCo, Inc.
                    

                        PEP
                    

                        Consumer Staples
                    

                        Large Cap Blend
                    

                        4.03 %
                    



                        Pfizer Inc.
                    

                        PFE
                    

                        Health Care
                    

                        Large Cap Value
                    

                        4.02 %
                    



                        Philip Morris International Inc.
                    

                        PM
                    

                        Consumer Staples
                    

                        Large Cap Value
                    

                        3.98 %
                    



                        Phillips 66
                    

                        PSX
                    

                        Energy
                    

                        Large Cap Value
                    

                        4.00 %
                    



                        Raytheon Company
                    

                        RTN
                    

                        Industrials
                    

                        Large Cap Value
                    

                        3.97 %
                    



                        AT&T Inc.
                    

                        T
                    

                        Telecommunication Services
                    

                        Large Cap Value
                    

                        4.01 %
                    



                        UnitedHealth Group Incorporated
                    

                        UNH
                    

                        Health Care
                    

                        Large Cap Blend
                    

                        4.02 %
                    



                        Verizon Communications Inc.
                    

                        VZ
                    

                        Telecommunication Services
                    

                        Large Cap Value
                    

                        4.00 %
                    




Data used for the Portfolio Holdings and Portfolio Allocation Characteristics is from Bloomberg Finance L.P. Portfolio holdings are provided for informational purposes only and should not be deemed as a recommendation to buy or sell individual securities. Portfolio Holdings and Portfolio Allocation Characteristics are as of deposit day and are subject to change and may vary thereafter.
The style and capitalization characteristics are designed to help investors understand how they fit into an overall investment plan. Value, blend and growth are types of investment styles. Growth Investing generally seeks stocks that offer the potential for greater-than-average earnings growth, and may entail greater risk than value or blend investing. Value investing generally seeks stocks that may be sound investments but are temporarily out of favor in the marketplace, and may entail less risk than growth investing. A blend investment combines the two styles. Market capitalization is determined by the following criteria: Large Cap: Greater than $10 billion, Mid Cap: $2 billion-$10 billion, Small Cap: $250 million-$2 billion Micro Cap: Below $250 million.


Risk Considerations
There is no assurance that a unit investment trust will achieve its investment objective. An investment in this unit investment trust is subject to market risk, which is the possibility that the market values of securities owned by the trust will decline and that the value of trust units may therefore be less than what you paid for them. This trust is unmanaged. Accordingly, you can lose money investing in this trust.

Common stocks do not assure dividend payments. Dividends are paid only when declared by an issuer’s board of directors and the amount of any dividend may vary over time. There can be no guarantee dividend payments from securities held in the trust, if any, will increase or that dividend yield on securities in the trust will be greater than the yield of any index mentioned herein.

A portfolio concentrated in a single market sector may present more risk than a portfolio broadly diversified over several sectors. This trust is concentrated in the consumer products sectors. Some of the general risks of companies in the consumer products sectors include cyclicality of revenues and earnings, economic recession, currency fluctuations, changing consumer tastes, extensive competition, product liability litigation and increased government regulation.

Investing in foreign securities involves certain risks not typically associated with investing solely in the United States. This may magnify volatility due to changes in foreign exchange rates, the political and economic uncertainties in foreign countries, U.S. or foreign tax treatment, and the potential lack of liquidity, government supervision and regulation.

Although this trust’s life is approximately 15 months, this strategy should be considered as part of a long-term investment strategy and investors should consider their ability to pursue investing in successive portfolios at the applicable sales charge, if available. There may be tax consequences associated with an investment from one series to the next unless units are purchased in an IRA or other qualified tax-deferred account. Investors should consult their tax advisor or attorney to determine tax consequences associated with an investment from one portfolio to the next.

NOT FDIC INSURED - NOT BANK GUARANTEED - MAY LOSE VALUE

Please consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the unit investment trust carefully before investing. The prospectus contains this and other information about this unit investment trust. To obtain a prospectus, please download a prospectus from sec.gov/edgar.shtml or the Unit Trust Offerings page. Please read the prospectus carefully before investing.

Incapital Unit Trust, Series 52, is a unit investment trust that consists of the Nuveen Large Cap Dividend Portfolio, 3Q 2014. Incapital LLC serves as the Sponsor to the Trust.

Nuveen Asset Management, LLC is a registered investment advisor and wholly owned subsidiary of Nuveen Investments. The Nuveen name and logo are registered marks of Nuveen Investments. Incapital LLC and Nuveen Asset Management, LLC are unaffiliated. Nuveen Asset Management, LLC provides the trust with portfolio consulting services.

The S&P 500® is a market weighted index of 500 stocks that are traded on the NYSE, NYSE MKT, and NASDAQ. “Standard & Poor’s®”, “S&P®” and “S&P 500®” are registered trademarks of Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC (“Standard & Poor’s”). The trust is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Standard & Poor’s and Standard & Poor’s does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in the securities. The Trust does not seek to match the performance or composition of the S&P 500® Index.

The “Russell 1000® Index” and all other Russell index names are registered trademarks of Russell Investment Group. The portfolio is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Russell Investment Group and Russell Investment Group does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in the securities.
    


Distributions



Record Date
                        
Distribution Date
                        
Reinvestment Date
                        
Reinvest Price
                        
Principal Distribution Per Unit
                        
Income Distribution Per Unit
                        





                    9/10/2014
                

                    9/25/2014
                

                    9/22/2014
                

                    $10.1079
                



                    $0.0148
                



                    12/10/2014
                

                    12/25/2014
                

                    12/22/2014
                

                    $10.1261
                



                    $0.0570
                



                    3/10/2015
                

                    3/25/2015
                

                    3/20/2015
                

                    $10.3386
                



                    $0.0629
                



                    6/10/2015
                

                    6/25/2015
                

                    6/22/2015
                

                    $10.3037
                



                    $0.0722
                



                    9/10/2015
                

                    9/25/2015
                

                    9/22/2015
                

                    $9.4880
                



                    $0.0791
                



Income distributions will vary with changes in dividends or interest received on the underlying securities and with changes in the trust's fees and expenses. Principal distributions will be made only when the trust receives principal cash and will therefore vary. Both income and principal distributions may be affected by the sale of securities in the portfolio. See the prospectus for a more detailed description of the factors which could affect income and principal distributions.
This page contains historical pricing or historical distributions information for the unit investment trust listed above. It should not be used for federal or state tax purposes, please contact your financial advisor for tax information.

2012 - Form 8937 - Report of Organizational Actions Affecting Basis of Securities  
2013 - Form 8937 - Report of Organizational Actions Affecting Basis of Securities  
2014 - Form 8937 - Report of Organizational Actions Affecting Basis of Securities  
2015 - Form 8937 - Report of Organizational Actions Affecting Basis of Securities  
2016 - Form 8937 - Report of Organizational Actions Affecting Basis of Securities  

23390-INV-AN-02/27 




Risk Considerations
There is no assurance that a unit investment trust will achieve its investment objective. An investment in this unit investment trust is subject to market risk, which is the possibility that the market values of securities owned by the trust will decline and that the value of trust units may therefore be less than what you paid for them. This trust is unmanaged. Accordingly, you can lose money investing in this trust.

Common stocks do not assure dividend payments. Dividends are paid only when declared by an issuer’s board of directors and the amount of any dividend may vary over time. There can be no guarantee dividend payments from securities held in the trust, if any, will increase or that dividend yield on securities in the trust will be greater than the yield of any index mentioned herein.

A portfolio concentrated in a single market sector may present more risk than a portfolio broadly diversified over several sectors. This trust is concentrated in the consumer products sectors. Some of the general risks of companies in the consumer products sectors include cyclicality of revenues and earnings, economic recession, currency fluctuations, changing consumer tastes, extensive competition, product liability litigation and increased government regulation.

Investing in foreign securities involves certain risks not typically associated with investing solely in the United States. This may magnify volatility due to changes in foreign exchange rates, the political and economic uncertainties in foreign countries, U.S. or foreign tax treatment, and the potential lack of liquidity, government supervision and regulation.

Although this trust’s life is approximately 15 months, this strategy should be considered as part of a long-term investment strategy and investors should consider their ability to pursue investing in successive portfolios at the applicable sales charge, if available. There may be tax consequences associated with an investment from one series to the next unless units are purchased in an IRA or other qualified tax-deferred account. Investors should consult their tax advisor or attorney to determine tax consequences associated with an investment from one portfolio to the next.

NOT FDIC INSURED - NOT BANK GUARANTEED - MAY LOSE VALUE

Please consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the unit investment trust carefully before investing. The prospectus contains this and other information about this unit investment trust. To obtain a prospectus, please download a prospectus from sec.gov/edgar.shtml or the Unit Trust Offerings page. Please read the prospectus carefully before investing.

Incapital Unit Trust, Series 52, is a unit investment trust that consists of the Nuveen Large Cap Dividend Portfolio, 3Q 2014. Incapital LLC serves as the Sponsor to the Trust.

Nuveen Asset Management, LLC is a registered investment advisor and wholly owned subsidiary of Nuveen Investments. The Nuveen name and logo are registered marks of Nuveen Investments. Incapital LLC and Nuveen Asset Management, LLC are unaffiliated. Nuveen Asset Management, LLC provides the trust with portfolio consulting services.

The S&P 500® is a market weighted index of 500 stocks that are traded on the NYSE, NYSE MKT, and NASDAQ. “Standard & Poor’s®”, “S&P®” and “S&P 500®” are registered trademarks of Standard & Poor’s Financial Services LLC (“Standard & Poor’s”). The trust is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Standard & Poor’s and Standard & Poor’s does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in the securities. The Trust does not seek to match the performance or composition of the S&P 500® Index.

The “Russell 1000® Index” and all other Russell index names are registered trademarks of Russell Investment Group. The portfolio is not sponsored, endorsed, sold or promoted by Russell Investment Group and Russell Investment Group does not make any representation regarding the advisability of investing in the securities.
    
























Documents






Resources



Summary


Trust Name:
Nuveen Large Cap Dividend Portfolio


Trust Series:
3Q 2014


Trust Symbol:
NLD3Q14


NASDAQ Symbol:
INNLAX


Portfolio Status:
Terminated


Offer Date:
7/17/2014


Termination Date:
10/16/2015


First Record Date:
9/10/2014


First Payment Date:
9/25/2014


Frequency:
Quarterly


Tax Structure:
RIC


Initial Public Offer price:
$10.0000


LIQ (1):
$10.0441


Est. Net Annual Income (2):
$0.2515


Hist. Annual Div. Dist. (3):
N/A


Cash Cusip:
45329H101


Reinvest Cusip:
45329H119


Fee Cash Cusip:
45329H127


Fee Reinvest Cusip:
45329H135





1. LIQ is the Liquidation Price.  Represents the value per unit that a unitholder would receive if the unitholder redeemed or sold units.  This price is equal to the net asset value per unit plus any remaining organization costs and creation & development fee.  This price reflects any remaining non-contingent deferred sales charges payable in connection with a liquidation of units.
2. There is no guarantee that any distributions will be made.  The estimated net annual income is per unit as of deposit day and based on the most recently declared dividends, distributions or interim and final dividends accounting for any foreign withholding taxes of the portfolio’s holdings.  The actual net annual income distributions you receive will vary from the estimate with changes in the portfolio’s fees and expenses, income received, currency fluctuations, and with the call, redemption, maturity, or sale of securities. 
3. The historical annual dividend distribution was calculated as of the day of deposit based on the trailing 12-month dividends or distributions paid by each issuer of securities in the trust portfolio and is net of the deferred sales charge and operating expenses charged by the trust. The trailing 12-month dividend for each issuer includes net dividend amounts for all fixed schedule dividends that have been declared over the past 12 months, excluding special distributions like special cash and return of capital, taxes, any related dividend fees and tax related credits. The amount of distributions you receive will vary from the above-stated amount due to changes in the dividends or distributions paid by issuers, changes in the trust's fees and expenses, income received, currency fluctuations, and with the call, redemption, maturity or sale of portfolio securities. Fees and expenses of the trust may vary as a result of the trust's size, redemption activity, brokerage and other transaction costs and extraordinary expenses among other factors.





















    16641-INV-AN-06/17

































				Nuveen, Incapital team up to offer new equity unit trust
	



































































































































Nuveen, Incapital team up to offer new equity unit trust
Strategist Bob Doll lends investment expertise to offering expected in early 2014






Nov 25, 2013 @ 1:53 pm
By 
	Trevor Hunnicutt























+ Zoom




      Two Chicago investment firms are linking together in a partnership aimed at helping both expand – starting with unit investment trusts.Fund manager Nuveen Asset Management and investment bank Incapital announced Monday a new stock-based unit investment trust developed with famous stock picker Robert C. Doll. The unit trust, which will debut in early 2014, is the first in a series of offerings to come from the partnership, Incapital's chief executive said on Monday.Unit investment trusts are a twist on the traditional mutual fund. Shareholders own a pool of investments that the portfolio manager buys and holds until a termination date, when the trust is dissolved and the proceeds are paid out. The underlying securities are not actively traded.
				



Unit trusts have been regaining popularity. There was nearly $72 billion in 5,787 unit trusts in 2012, up from about $60 billion in 2011, according to the Investment Company Institute. That is the highest asset level the product has seen, in absolute terms, since 2000. Stock-based trusts draw the lion's share, or 92%, of new deposits.In an interview, Incapital chief executive John Radtke said the unit trusts would be the first in a series of offerings by the partnership, which will take advantage of Nuveen's investment management expertise and Incapital's distribution network, as well as their trading and reporting website for issuers and broker-dealers.“There's more opportunities to grow this pie in the future,” Mr. Radtke said. “Our customer base was looking to move away from fixed income to alternative asset classes including equities.”Mr. Doll's career in the asset management industry has spanned more than three decades. The equity strategist retired from BlackRock Inc. last year after it was revealed that his proprietary quantitative methods actually were third-party models that he had tweaked and customized. Months later, he emerged in a new role at Nuveen. Nuveen, which historically has focused on local government debt, has been working to develop its offerings across asset classes since some of its bond offerings became unredeemable when credit markets seized up in 2008. The firm, which merged with U.S. Bancorp's long-term asset business after a 2010 acquisition, managed $118 billion in assets as of Sept. 30.Incapital is a boutique investment bank that specializes in bonds and complex debt products like structured notes — a hybrid derivative that might, for instance, combine the characteristics of a bond with those of an option to alter the risk-and-return profile of the investment.The chairman of Incapital is Thomas S. Ricketts, the son of TD Ameritrade Inc. founder J. Joseph Ricketts. The family purchased the Chicago Cubs baseball franchise in 2009.









0
Comments

What do you think?
View comments



Please enable JavaScript to view the comments powered by Disqus.










Recommended for you













Related stories










Take 5: Vanguard's new CIO Greg Davis talks bonds, stocks and costs














Fidelity: Will Goldilocks market have a happy ending?














Growth funds soar in first six months of 2017










Sponsored financial news




Most popular



1



Vanguard winning at bond inflows, too





2



9 ways advisers can attract millennial clients





3



Jay Clayton says SEC, DOL can give market 'clarity' on fiduciary rule













Featured video

		Events
The business case for hiring NextGen talentFirms hiring nextgen talent have reaped the benefits from greater productivity to revenue growth.  Clearly, there's a business case to be made for hiring millennials.  Kate Healy of TD Ameritrade breaks it down.Video SpotlightWill It Last As Long As Your Clients Do?Sponsored by Prudential	INTV
Stephanie Bogan: How financial advisers can achieve more by reframing their realities




Channels

INTV
Events
Practice Makeover
Smarter in 60 Seconds
Secrets Behind Success
Gadget Girl
The Secret Life of...
Consuelo Mack Wealthtrack









Latest news & opinion




Jay Clayton says SEC, DOL can give market 'clarity' on fiduciary rule
Chief regulator is confident two agencies could reach 'common ground' on an investment advice standard across all accounts. 






Vanguard winning at bond inflows, too
But iShares is strong competition.






Sen. Gary Peters brings broker background to work every day on Capitol Hill
Michigan Democrat resists ripping up DOL fiduciary rule but would be open to some changes.






DOL fiduciary rule causing DC-plan record keepers to change business with insurance agents
Principal has communicated that independent agents must change their business models to keep receiving compensation.






DOL fiduciary rule opponents want to push implementation back until 2019
ICI, Chamber of Commerce among groups asking for delay, while Democratic lawmakers call on DOL to keep to its earlier planned schedule of Jan. 1, 2018.





 
 







X


Subscribe and Save 60%




Premium AccessPrint + Digital
Learn more
















Subscribe to Print
Newsletter Sign-up
Register





Now in print


This week's issue
To download the full contents of this week's issue, click here.
Past Issues
July 8, 2017
June 24, 2017
June 17, 2017


Subscribe to Print



Get daily news & intel

The pulse of the financial advisory industry.








Breaking news and in-depth coverage of essential topics delivered straight to your inbox.
view all newsletters





Connect with us

Register to access our archive of leading investment information and data









Follow @newsfromIN
Follow @eventsfromIN
Follow @statsfromIN


Follow InvestmentNews
Financial Adviser Group
Retirement Income Summit Group
Alternative Investments Conference
40 Under 40


Like us on Facebook
Like our fan page to receive the latest news and opinion from InvestmentNews.



Latest News & Opinion
Subscribe to this RSS feed to receive the latest news and opinion from InvestmentNews.


















































	Incapital - News
























































            If you have any questions, please Contact Us








The link you have selected is located on another server. Please click the link below once more to proceed to the selected site. Incapital does not endorse this website, its sponsor, or any of the policies, activities, products, or services offered on the site or by any advertiser on the site.  


The link you have selected will redirect you to NuveenUIT.com since as of April 30, 2016 Nuveen Investments acquired Incapital’s unit trust platform. Please click the link below once more to proceed to the selected site. Incapital does not endorse this website, its sponsor, or any of the policies, activities, products, or services offered on the site or by any advertiser on the site.
















Home
Contact Us
News
Careers
Incapnet





Login  




Incapital.com Login



 
    


Forgot Password


Register Now


To receive full access to our site, including new issue updates, offering documents, and continuing education






























ToolsFAQsGlossariesCommentaries

Cost of Waiting CalculatorSearch Past Offering DocsEducation CenterHelpful SitesIncapitalInterNotes®Market-Linked ProductsPreferred Security FAQsBond BasicsMBSMarket-Linked ProductsFixed Income Market InsightsMBS Commentary

Search OfferingsEmail UpdatesIncapnet




















Who We Serve



Broker-Dealers



Institutional Investors



Financial Advisors



Issuers




















Offerings Overview
Current New Issues
Search Offerings
Legacy™

Corporate Debt/InterNotes®Market-Linked ProductsCertificates of Deposit

OverviewIssuersCurrent OfferingsOverviewIssuersCurrent OfferingsResource CenterKey IndicesOfferings CalendarOverviewCurrent OfferingsCD Bank Funding

Sovereigns, Supranationals and Agencies (SSA)AnnuitiesPreferred Stock

OverviewIssuersCurrent OfferingsOverviewAnnuity ProvidersCurrent OfferingsOverviewLEOPARDSTMIssuersCurrent Offerings

Mortgage-Backed Securities

Overview


















About Incapital



Executive Team



Business Development



Fixed Income



Wealth Management Solutions - Trading & Origination



Wealth Management Solutions - Sales Distribution



Recognition



In the Community



News



Careers



Contact Us



















                News
            
[Press Release]














Most Visited




Current New Issues


About InterNotes


Market-Linked CDs & Notes


CDs - Current Offerings


Agencies - Current O..








    
      
    
      
    
      
    
      




Print






Date: 
    6/9/2015


Source: 

        Incapital  
    


Author: 
    Incapital
    




        View all News
        
          
    


Incapital and Nuveen Investments Expand Unit Trust Partnership


New Unit Trusts Leverage Expertise of Nuveen’s Multi-Affiliate Model
Enhanced by Incapital Additions to Unit Trust Business
Nuveen Expands Specialist Sales Support Team for Unit Trusts

CHICAGO, June 9, 2015 – Incapital LLC and Nuveen Investments, today announced the expansion of their joint-distribution and portfolio consultant unit trust partnership with the addition of new unit trusts and expanded sales resources at both firms to support the growth of the unit trust business and better serve the financial advisor community and their clients. Since the beginning of 2014, Nuveen and Incapital have partnered together on key aspects of unit trust product development, marketing, distribution and client relationship management.  In this partnership, Incapital serves as trust underwriter and sponsor, providing units to the public through broker-dealers and other firms.  Nuveen Investments, through its several affiliates, serves as portfolio consultant responsible for developing investment strategies and constructing model portfolios for the unit trusts.
Commenting on the partnership, John DesPrez, Incapital’s Chief Executive Officer, said, “Incapital’s relationship with Nuveen Investments continues to deepen. With the expansion of our joint-distribution agreement, we will be offering a wider range of investment strategies to thousands of additional financial advisors and their clients.”


INCAPITAL UNIT TRUSTS FEATURING NUVEEN’S INVESTMENT EXPERTISE
Since inception of the partnership, Incapital has offered five equity unit trust strategies that draw upon the deep and specialized expertise of Nuveen Investments’ affiliates: 

Nuveen Equity Outlook Portfolios
Nuveen Large Cap Dividend Portfolios 
Nuveen Core Real Estate Securities Portfolios
Nuveen NWQ Global Dividend Value Portfolios
Nuveen Tradewinds Global Energy Revolution Portfolio

To further broaden its platform for clients, Incapital has been working closely with Nuveen this year to develop a robust pipeline of new unit trusts employing a variety of strategies and themes.  Capitalizing on the recently closed Nuveen 2015 Equity Outlook Portfolio, Series 68, which more than doubled in assets from the prior year’s series, Incapital filed an initial registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) for the Nuveen 2015 Mid-Year Equity Outlook Portfolio, Series 86   This new unit trust’s portfolio selection is led by Bob Doll, Nuveen Asset Management’s Senior Portfolio Manager and Chief Equity Strategist, and seeks to include a mid-year update in which Bob Doll reassesses his investment outlook as expressed in his 2015 Ten Predictions.
Additionally, Incapital filed an initial registration statement with the SEC for the Nuveen Symphony Low Volatility Equity Portfolio, Series 88, which employs the investment expertise of Symphony Asset Management, an affiliate of Nuveen Investments.  Recognized for their rigorous fundamental research and alternative investment/hedge fund expertise, Symphony applies a team-based approach to valuation and risk analysis, which seeks to identify and translate relative value into desired risk/reward portfolio outcomes.
Bill Adams, Nuveen Investments’ Senior Executive Vice President and Head of Global Structured Products added, “We are very pleased to expand our relationship with Incapital as we work to bring innovative investment options to investors.  We believe unit trusts can expand the ability of investors and their advisors to access the specialized investment expertise of our affiliates across a broad range of asset classes to help them better achieve their financial objectives.”


JOINT-DISTRIBUTION EFFORT
Incapital has recently appointed Hugh McHaffie as Managing Director who will soon oversee the origination and distribution of a range of wealth management solutions, including Unit Trust, Market Linked and Annuity offerings. McHaffie is supported by a veteran Unit Trust origination team in Chicago, headed by John Browning, Managing Director and Randy Watts, Executive Director. Pat Dwyer, National Sales Manager, will soon lead Incapital’s nation-wide distribution network supporting financial advisors seeking wealth management investment solutions for their clients.
Given the performance of the current unit trust offerings, strong interest from the market, and robust pipeline of new offerings currently under consideration, Nuveen Investments is also enhancing its unit trust distribution efforts with the appointment of Melissa Roe as Managing Director, National Head of Unit Trust Sales.  Overseeing a team of external and internal unit trust specialists, Roe will act as a liaison between Nuveen Investments and Incapital to represent the capabilities of Nuveen Investments’ affiliates and ensure that the needs of financial advisors and their investor clients are being served.



About Incapital
Incapital was founded in 1999 and today is a leading underwriter and distributor of securities to more than 800 broker-dealers, institutions, asset managers, RIAs and banks. The firm represents more than 300 issuing entities and has a track record of over $400 billion in underwritten securities. Further information on Incapital is available at www.incapital.com. Further information on Incapital’s Unit Trust Portfolios, including securities selection, fees, secondary market and other risk considerations is available on incapital.com.


About Nuveen Investments
Nuveen Investments provides high-quality investment services designed to help secure the long-term goals of institutional and individual investors as well as the consultants and financial advisors who serve them. Nuveen Investments markets a wide range of specialized investment solutions which provide investors access to capabilities of its high-quality boutique investment affiliates—Nuveen Asset Management, LLC, Symphony Asset Management LLC, NWQ Investment Management Company, LLC, Santa Barbara Asset Management, LLC, Tradewinds Global Investors, LLC, Winslow Capital Management, LLC and Gresham Investment Management LLC, all of which are registered investment advisers and independent investment subsidiaries of Nuveen Investments, Inc. Nuveen Investments operates as a separate subsidiary within TIAA-CREF, which is a leading provider of retirement and financial services in the academic, research, medical and cultural fields. In total, Nuveen Investments managed approximately $233 billion as of March 31, 2015. For more information, please visit the Nuveen Investments website at www.nuveen.com.
Nuveen Investments, Inc. and its related entities named above are unaffiliated with Incapital LLC. 


The information herein is not complete and is subject to change. We may not sell these securities until the registration statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission is effective. This notice is not an offer to sell these securities and is not soliciting an offer to buy these securities in any state or jurisdiction where the offer or sale is not permitted.
There is no assurance that a unit investment trust will achieve its investment objective. An investment in this unit investment trust is subject to market risk, which is the possibility that the market values of securities owned by the trust will decline and that the value of trust units may therefore be less than what you paid for them. These unit investment trusts are unmanaged. You can lose money investing in unit investment trusts.  
Please consider the investment objectives, risks, charges and expenses of the unit investment trust carefully before investing. The prospectus contains this and other information about this unit investment trust. To obtain a prospectus, please download a prospectus from sec.gov/edgar.shtml or the Unit Trust Offerings page on incapital.com. Please read the prospectus carefully before investing.  Incapital LLC serves as the Sponsor to the Trusts. Incapital Unit Trust, Series 68, is a unit investment trust that consists of the Nuveen 2015 Equity Outlook Portfolio. Incapital Unit Trust, Series 86, is a unit investment trust that consists of the Nuveen 2015 Mid-Year Equity Outlook Portfolio.   Incapital Unit Trust, Series 88, is a unit investment trust that consists of the Nuveen Symphony Low Volatility Equity Portfolio.
NOT FDIC INSURED | NOT BANK GUARANTEED | MAY LOSE VALUE
©2015 Incapital. All rights reserved. Securities offered through and unit investment trusts sponsored by Incapital LLC, Member FINRA & SIPC, 200 South Wacker Drive, Chicago, IL 60606.


MEDIA CONTACT
Incapital: Jim Schaberg
312-379-3752
MEDIA CONTACT
Nuveen Investments: Kathleen Cardoza
312-917-7813









About



About IncapitalExecutive TeamBusiness DevelopmentFixed IncomeWealth Management Solutions - Trading & OriginationWealth Management Solutions - Sales DistributionRecognitionIn the CommunityNewsCareersContact Us














Contact Us
/
Risk Considerations
/
Legal
/
Sitemap
/
Terms of Use























    &copy2017 Securities offered through and UITs sponsored by Incapital LLC, Member FINRA/SIPC.  Annuities and insurance products offered through Incapital Insurance Services LLC, Member 
    FINRA/SIPC



























Page not found - TheStreet

















 

 




















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Action Alerts OPTIONS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street




































 
















Page not found

        Sorry, the page you're looking for is not available.
    
    You might want to try:
    

Our homepage


Our most popular stories






























 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers



 







 







 







 







 







 















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












U.S. Trust - Investment Management




















































  Search

HomeAbout UsOur CapabilitiesOur Latest ThinkingAccount Access









1.800.U.S.TRUST|
Have Us Contact You|
Find an Office Near You|
Client Login



























Investment Management
Insights, Strategies and Solutions
Our experienced professionals have expertise in a broad spectrum of traditional, alternative and non-financial assets.  We can work with you to develop and manage a portfolio tailored to your needs.






Portfolio Consulting
A collaborative dialogue with your portfolio manager
Your portfolio manager is a key member of your U.S. Trust relationship team and serves as your personal "chief investment officer." He or she will work with you to create an Investment Policy Statement, which serves as a blueprint for your portfolio by documenting your:

Objectives
Risk tolerance
Cash flow needs
 Tax situation
Wealth aspirations

Your portfolio manager's ongoing role is to incorporate our best strategic and tactical thinking, most relevant research analysis, current market insights and appropriate investment solutions into your portfolio. He or she will regularly monitor your portfolio to make sure it conforms to your Investment Policy Statement, which will be updated whenever there are significant changes in your life or goals.
Asset management
A more complete approach to asset allocation1
We analyze a wide range of asset classes, including hedge and private equity funds2 and global investment opportunities, as potential components of an asset allocation. In addition, we believe that true diversification requires managing for cash flows across and within asset classes in various market environments — not simply allocating according to a grid.
Your asset allocation will be based on the long-term expectations established for each asset class by our most senior investment professionals. Over the shorter term, however, your portfolio manager can adjust your portfolio tactically in response to emerging opportunities and risks, and reflecting U.S. Trust insights about trends and themes relevant to you.
How you own your assets — personally or in trusts; in taxable or tax-exempt solutions — can have a material impact on the overall performance of your portfolio. At U.S. Trust we focus on this wealth structuring aspect of your portfolio in conjunction with managing the assets themselves.
Alternative Investments
SOPHISTICATED SOLUTIONS TO MEET YOUR NEEDS2
Alternative investments at U.S. Trust focus on non-traditional assets such as:

Hedge funds
Private equity
Real estate and tangible assets

Because performance is often differentiated from equity and fixed income markets, alternative investments may be an ideal complement to traditional investments. 
Through our access to the industry's premier managers, we are able to offer solutions that provide options for all client segments. And we support you every step of the way with knowledge built on our experience in alternatives, including industry-leading research, rigorous due diligence, and cutting-edge portfolio construction.
Drawing from the experience, resources and expertise of the firm, you and your portfolio manager can explore alternative investments that can help you pursue what matters most to you.
Specialty asset management
Expertise in nonfinancial assets3
Specialty asset management at U.S. Trust focuses on nonfinancial assets such as:

Farm and ranch land
Timberland
Oil and gas properties
Private businesses
Real estate

Our Specialty Asset Management team can work with your portfolio manager and wealth strategist, as appropriate, to integrate these real assets into your overall plan and portfolio.
We can help you realize your objectives with assets you already own, or help you acquire specific assets to take advantage of their capital growth and diversification potential — whether you own these assets outright or they are held in trust.
Our team of specialists can provide complete turnkey services including identifying and purchasing real property and providing ongoing management.
Capital markets
Sophisticated market-linked solutions4
Through our access to the resources of Merrill Lynch, one of the world's leading capital markets participants, we can tailor approaches to risks and opportunities in the foreign exchange, interest rate, commodity and equity markets. Derivative-based transactions target the risks you seek to hedge, and are designed to dovetail with your overall portfolio and wealth management strategies.

1 Asset allocation and diversification do not ensure a profit or protect against loss in declining markets.
2 Alternative Investments such as derivatives, hedge funds, private equity funds, and funds of funds can result in higher return potential but also higher loss potential. Changes in economic conditions or other circumstances may adversely affect your investments. Before you invest in alternative investments, you should consider your overall financial situation, how much money you have to invest, your need for liquidity, and your tolerance for risk. Alternative investments are speculative and involve a high degree of risk.
3 Nonfinancial assets, such as closely-held businesses, real estate, oil, gas and mineral properties, and timber, farm and ranch land, are complex in nature and involve risks including total loss of value.  Special risk considerations include natural events (for example, earthquakes or fires), complex tax considerations, and lack of liquidity.  Nonfinancial assets are not suitable for all investors.  Always consult with your independent attorney, tax advisor, investment manager, and insurance agent for final recommendations and before changing or implementing any financial, tax, or estate planning strategy.
4 Brokerage services are provided by Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, a registered broker-dealer, Member SIPC and a wholly owned subsidiary of Bank of America Corporation.
Certain U.S. Trust associates are registered representatives with Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated ("MLPF&S") and may assist you with investment products and services provided through MLPF&S and other nonbank investment affiliates. MLPF&S is a registered broker-dealer, member SIPC and a wholly owned subsidiary of Bank of America Corporation ("BofA Corp."). U.S. Trust operates through Bank of America, N.A., and other subsidiaries of BofA Corp.
AR-ARY4G4DX-EXP-2017.06.17 






Videos:


Investment Management




Portfolio Construction



Fixed Income Solutions



Specialty Asset Manangement

View More Videos






You Might Also Be Interested In:

Wealth Structuring
Credit & Banking
Family Wealth Services
Specialty Asset Management
Institutional Investment Management
Philanthropy



Read Some of Our Latest Thinking

A Transforming World


Impact Investing




























 Investment Management Wealth Structuring Credit & Banking Working with U.S. Trust Press Room 



 Capital Acumen Available on the iPhone App Store 


Connect With Us:


Phone Number
Twitter
LinkedIn
YouTube





 U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management Homepage






Investment products:  Are Not FDIC InsuredAre Not Bank GuaranteedMay Lose Value
Credit and collateral subject to approval. Terms and conditions apply. Programs, rates, terms and conditions subject to change without notice.
U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management operates through  Bank of America, N.A. and other subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation.


Bank of America Home · Privacy & Security
Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC. Equal Housing Lender 
©  Bank of America Corporation. All rights reserved.






CA7FC4BF (SCB*******803)




   







U.S. Trust - Our Latest Thinking




















































  Search

HomeAbout UsOur CapabilitiesOur Latest ThinkingAccount Access









1.800.U.S.TRUST|
Have Us Contact You|
Find an Office Near You|
Client Login

























Our Latest Thinking











Identifying the main drivers of long-term change is key to investment success in the 21st century. We believe we are at the beginning of a secular growth phase for the U.S. economy driven largely by the rebalancing of global growth from the developed to the developing world. We focus on the long-term drivers, the macro forces and investment themes at play across industries that are taking us into the next growth cycle.
Learn More






2017 Mid-Year ISO: The Tortoise and the Hare Cycle

Learn More









2017 U.S. Trust Insights on Wealth and Worth®
Our Survey results reveal common success traits that create a picture of modern day wealth in America.
Learn More









Reaping What We Compute
The Future of Technology in Agriculture
Learn More






Making It Your Mission
What values drive and inform your giving?
Learn More






Estate Administration in the Digital Era
Modern technology and antiquated statutes can present estate administrators with unexpected challenges.
Learn More






Highlights from the 2016 U.S. Trust® Study of HNW Philanthropy
Our study reveals a passion for philanthropy but also uncertainty about the impact.
Watch The Video






Capital Acumen Issue 32
 The art market is attracting new buyers and changing attitudes toward art as part of an overall financial portfolio.
Learn More






Art in a New World
The art market is attracting new buyers and changing attitudes toward art as a part of an overall financial portfolio.
Learn More






The Growing Adoption of Wind Power
 The wind power industry is expected to deliver rapid job growth over the next decade.
Learn More






THE OWNER'S EMOTIONAL JOURNEY
 Lessons Learned Before, During and After the Sale of a Business 
Learn More






2017 Viewpoint: Shifting winds
Navigating Uncertainty with Specialty Assets
Learn More






Market Insights You Can Act On
Having the ability to have a pulse on what's going on around the world is absolutely critical.
Watch The Video









Alternative Energy: Powering a Brighter Future
Conventional sources are expected to continue to dominate the energy mix as the world moves toward a low-carbon economy
Learn More






Technology Is Disrupting Everything—Even Sneakers
CIO Chris Hyzy looks at game-changing innovation across industries and the often unexpected investment opportunities it's creating
Watch The Video






Sci-Fi M.D.: Moore's Law Meets the Hippocratic Oath
With technology generating futuristic advances, look for investment opportunities within healthcare — and beyond
Learn More






The Ripple Effect of Brexit
The repercussions of the UK's vote point to an uncertain future across the Eurozone and elsewhere.
Learn More






New Administration, New Realities for Investors
Optimism about the impact of President Trump's potentially pro-growth policies accelerates tectonic shifts in the markets.
Learn More






Five Investment Themes for 2017
Global equity markets are ending the year on a high note with solid gains for the fourth quarter so far in the U.S., Europe and Japan.
Learn More






PRESIDENT TRUMP: WHAT HIS TAX PROPOSALS COULD MEAN FOR YOU
Mitch Drossman discusses what tax-planning steps individuals and corporations should consider.
Watch The Video






The 2016 U.S. Trust® Study of High Net Worth Philanthropy 
Who's Giving to Which Causes and Why
Read More






Don't Fight the Fed
Despite unfavorable predictions from many economists, a stable dollar and the Federal Reserve's cautious stance seem to have staved off a global recession.
Read More






Investing in Iran: Roses or Thorns?
 In a nation newly open to foreign commerce, we find an abundance of investment opportunities — and caveats
Read More






In Conversation With Jane McGonigal
Shall we play a game? The author and video game designer talks time, gaming and the future.
Read More






IMPACT INVESTING: PEOPLE, THE PLANET AND PROFIT
As Impact Investing Comes Of Age, Investors Can Finally Seek a Better World and Return on Investment.
Learn More






Can China's Economy Bounce Back
DeAnne Steele on the depreciation of the yuan, the changing focus of the Chinese economy, and what it all means for investors.
Read More







Business Owners: You, Your Family, and Your Business
Working with a global financial services company helps enable you to address — and simplify — both your business and personal financial lives.

Learn More  







 KEEPING PENSION FUNDING GOALS IN SIGHT
This white paper investigates the use of exchange-traded funds (ETFs) in pension funding strategies.
Learn More 






Investing for Maximum Impact
Today's investors are using their portfolios to change the world-without losing return potential
Learn More




 



Addressing Memory and Your Family
There is no cure for cognitive decline, but we have a partial solution: being prepared for the unexpected.
Watch The Video






Rebuilding America: The Road Ahead
U.S. roads and highways, bridges and power grids, and other critical infrastructure have fallen into dangerous disrepair.
Learn More






Timberland as a Sustainable Investment
Timberland offers an opportunity to pursue both—an environmentally sensitive investment platform and financial advantages.
Learn More







Jackie VanderBrug, an investment strategist at U.S. Trust, highlights why women are growing into an economic superpower
Learn More







Women and Climate Change
Jackie VanderBrug, an investment strategist at U.S. Trust, describes how women may be especially vulnerable to the effects of climate change
Learn More






Direct Real Estate Investing
Commercial real estate offers the potential for attractive yields, capital appreciation and valuable tax benefits.
Learn More






A fixed income investment approach designed to optimize after-tax yield and after-tax total return
Learn More






Experiences shared and lessons learned from entrepreneurs who successfully sold or transferred their businesses to family members.
Learn More









Intelligent Outsourcing
This white paper examines when the outsourced chief investment officer (OCIO) arrangement may be appropriate for an organization.
Learn More






The Power of Positive Teaching
Educating children about the responsibilities of wealth can help keep them wealth-smart.
Learn More





Mitch Drossman, U.S. Trust's national director of wealth planning strategies, discusses the midterm election results, their possible legislative impact, and the implications from a tax-planning perspective.
Watch The Video












Specialty Asset Management
Our Specialty Asset Management team can work with your portfolio manager and wealth strategist to integrate these real assets into your overall plan and portfolio.
Learn More






Transitioning America's Farmland
It's clear that over the next decade or so, much of America's farmland — now held or farmed by an aging generation — will need to be transitioned.
Learn More






From Best Practices to Next Practices
In search of long-term and sustained philanthropic impact.
Learn More






Making Specialty Asset Gifts Work for Your Organization
Without the proper planning, accepting gifts of real assets today can lead to unexpected and potentially costly consequences. Are you prepared?
Learn More






Women and Girls Equality Strategy
By applying a gender lens, investors can align their portfolios with the goal of supporting gender equality while seeking a market rate of return.
Learn More






The more successful and established entrepreneurs become, the more likely they are to want a more formal mechanism for giving.
Learn More






Family Wealth Services
Our comprehensive, values-based approach to meeting the wealth management needs of our clients and their families.
Learn More






The ElderCare Planning Program
We are committed to addressing the wealth management needs of our clients and their aging families.
Learn More






Personalized Banking and Credit
Your banking and credit needs deserve the same level of expertise as your investments.
Learn More






Customized Aviation Financing
Developing a financing strategy for your aircraft.
Learn More






Financial Empowerment
Prepare your children for the important financial opportunities that lie ahead.
Learn More






Financing a special and unique asset.
Learn More



 






 







Filter By:





Capabilities


Show All
Investment Management
Wealth Structuring and Planning
Credit & Banking




Topics


Show All

Tax Planning
Trusts and Estates
Non-Financial Assets
Philanthropy










Back to Top




AR-ARTPRMPV-EXP-2018.02.7























 Investment Management Wealth Structuring Credit & Banking Working with U.S. Trust Press Room 



 Capital Acumen Available on the iPhone App Store 


Connect With Us:


Phone Number
Twitter
LinkedIn
YouTube





 U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management Homepage






Investment products:  Are Not FDIC InsuredAre Not Bank GuaranteedMay Lose Value
Credit and collateral subject to approval. Terms and conditions apply. Programs, rates, terms and conditions subject to change without notice.
U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management operates through  Bank of America, N.A. and other subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation.


Bank of America Home · Privacy & Security
Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC. Equal Housing Lender 
©  Bank of America Corporation. All rights reserved.






CA7FC4BF (SCB*******803)



   







U.S. Trust - Credit and Banking




















































  Search

HomeAbout UsOur CapabilitiesOur Latest ThinkingAccount Access









1.800.U.S.TRUST|
Have Us Contact You|
Find an Office Near You|
Client Login



























Credit and Banking
Financing and Liquidity Solutions
With our wide array of credit and banking capabilities, we can build a custom credit solution that works for you.






Custom credit
Sophisticated solutions for your credit needs1
Your financial strength allows you to use credit strategically to create and benefit from unique financial opportunities. We can provide financing solutions to help meet immediate short and long-term needs plus specialty financing options when your borrowing need is to acquire assets, including:

Yachts
Aircraft
Fine art
Investor commercial real estate
Hedge funds
Concentrated or restricted stock positions
Recreational real estate


Customized credit solutions can also play a crucial role in implementing your trust and wealth transfer strategies.
Private Client Line2
A flexible line of credit, secured by your investment management accounts at U.S. Trust. The Private Client Line is designed to help you meet liquidity needs and enhance your cash flow without depleting cash reserves or compromising your investment strategy.

Private Client Line 

Liquidity services
Simplified banking and enhanced convenience
A key component of your overall financial strategy should include cash management. At U.S. Trust, we offer traditional banking solutions and services designed to help you:

Manage traditional everyday liquidity
Maximize access and convenience to your funds
Generate competitive returns on your deposit balances

Your client team will develop a tailored financial strategy to help meet your short-term liquidity needs as well as your longer-term personal and financial goals.
Real estate finance
A strategic approach to structuring transactions
The right mortgage can not only meet your residential real estate needs, but can be a cornerstone of managing your wealth. You will be advised by a team of specialists who understand substantial real estate transactions and the importance of personalized loan structures. From traditional or customized mortgages to home equity lines of credit, we will work to find the right solution to help meet your needs.
Financial management tools
Sophisticated and secure account management services
Monitor and manage your U.S. Trust accounts at any time using our sophisticated and secure online and mobile3 banking capabilities. You can also view your accounts at other financial institutions4 and transfer funds from them into your U.S. Trust accounts.
If you own a small business, simplify your business banking and management through our powerful account management service. In addition to these everyday banking services, U.S. Trust offers special resources to families with particularly complex wealth needs and ownership structures.

1 Bank of America, N.A. and its affiliates do not serve in a fiduciary capacity when offering or providing any type of credit solution.
2 The Private Client Line is offered by U.S. Trust and not by or through Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated. Credit is subject to approval. Normal credit standards apply.
3 You must first enroll in Online Banking and set up Transfers and Bill Pay. Wireless carrier fees may apply.
4 To view accounts from another financial institution, you must have online access set up with that institution.
Always consult with your independent attorney, tax advisor, investment manager and insurance agent for final recommendations and before changing or implementing any financial, tax or estate planning strategy.
Banking & Mortgage products are provided by Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC.
AR-ARJKLDHJ-EXP-2017.12.14






Videos:


Art as a Source of Liquidity



Leveraging Your Art Collection








You Might Also Be Interested In:

Investment Management
Wealth Structuring
Family Wealth Services
Specialty Asset Management
Philanthropy



Read Some of Our Latest Thinking

Personalized Banking and Credit
Aviation Financing
Customized Marine Financing
Fine Art Lending




























 Investment Management Wealth Structuring Credit & Banking Working with U.S. Trust Press Room 



 Capital Acumen Available on the iPhone App Store 


Connect With Us:


Phone Number
Twitter
LinkedIn
YouTube





 U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management Homepage






Investment products:  Are Not FDIC InsuredAre Not Bank GuaranteedMay Lose Value
Credit and collateral subject to approval. Terms and conditions apply. Programs, rates, terms and conditions subject to change without notice.
U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management operates through  Bank of America, N.A. and other subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation.


Bank of America Home · Privacy & Security
Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC. Equal Housing Lender 
©  Bank of America Corporation. All rights reserved.






CA7FC4BF (SCB*******803)




   







U.S. Trust - Wealth Structuring




















































  Search

HomeAbout UsOur CapabilitiesOur Latest ThinkingAccount Access









1.800.U.S.TRUST|
Have Us Contact You|
Find an Office Near You|
Client Login



























Wealth Structuring
Preservation and Transfer
Your wealth plan is designed to provide you and your family with thoughtful and innovative solutions customized to the financial and personal complexities of your life.  We bring you knowledge, experience and expertise across the broad range of wealth structuring disciplines.






Wealth Planning
Integrating your personal and financial affairs
By thinking holistically about all aspects of your wealth, we develop customized strategies to help pursue your unique goals. Wealth structuring can help you address issues including:

The cash flow required to help meet your lifestyle
The investments needed to help meet long-range objectives 
The most effective way to pursue estate planning goals 
The tax implications of the many aspects of managing and transferring your wealth

Trusts and Estates
Shaping your legacy and transferring your wealth
For more than two centuries, U.S. Trust has been helping many of America's wealthiest families build estate plans and implement wealth transfer strategies. Your team can work with you to build a sound estate plan that may help you:

Control the transfer of wealth to those you care about
Fulfill important philanthropic commitments
Reduce estate taxes
Maintain your privacy
Protect assets from creditors and other third parties

We can help you and your attorney establish trusts to provide financial security for your spouse or partner, pass assets to future generations and charities and reduce estate taxes, as well as provide for financial and investment management during your lifetime. We bring our extensive knowledge and experience to bear in helping clients manage their trusts whether we are serving as agent for trustee or corporate trustee.
Philanthropy
Making your charitable giving more fulfilling and effective
We offer you personal support and an array of tools to help you and your family assess your charitable goals, values and interests. Your philanthropic specialist can then help you understand a range of important considerations, including how to:

Implement your plan
Identify the best-qualified grant recipients
Monitor the impact of your efforts

We can help you design and implement a philanthropic strategy that helps you fulfill your values-based commitments in a way that is consistent with your lifestyle.
Learn more about Philanthropy at U.S. Trust
Custody Services
Benefiting from the experience of dedicated custody specialists
U.S. Trust is the custodian of choice for many sophisticated investors with extensive and complex holdings. Whether you manage your own portfolio or work with multiple brokers and investment managers, we can structure a personalized custody program that simplifies portfolio and trade monitoring and helps meet your specific safekeeping, service and information needs.

Always consult with your independent attorney, tax advisor, investment manager and insurance agent for final recommendations and before changing or implementing any financial, tax or estate planning strategy.
Bank of America, N.A. and the U.S. Trust Company of Delaware (collectively the "Bank") do not serve in a fiduciary capacity with respect to all products or services. Fiduciary standards or fiduciary duties do not apply, for example, when the Bank is offering or providing credit solutions, banking, custody or brokerage products/services or referrals to other affiliates of the Bank.
AR-AR7F755H-EXP-2018.05.09






Videos:
 
The Role of a Fiduciary

 
Wealth Planning

 
Agent For Fiduciary

 
Eldercare Planning Services

 
Financial Empowerment

 
Private Philanthropy Services

View More Videos 





You Might Also Be Interested In:

Investment Management
Credit & Banking
Tax Planning
Family Wealth Services
THE FAMILY OFFICE DECISION
Philanthropy
Comprehensive Services For Auto Dealership Owners




























 Investment Management Wealth Structuring Credit & Banking Working with U.S. Trust Press Room 



 Capital Acumen Available on the iPhone App Store 


Connect With Us:


Phone Number
Twitter
LinkedIn
YouTube





 U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management Homepage






Investment products:  Are Not FDIC InsuredAre Not Bank GuaranteedMay Lose Value
Credit and collateral subject to approval. Terms and conditions apply. Programs, rates, terms and conditions subject to change without notice.
U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management operates through  Bank of America, N.A. and other subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation.


Bank of America Home · Privacy & Security
Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC. Equal Housing Lender 
©  Bank of America Corporation. All rights reserved.






CA7FC4BF (SCB*******803)




   








American Private Money Group Trust Deed Investments Trust Deed Opportunities High Yield Trust Deeds









































American Private Money Group Trust Deed Investments Trust Deed Opportunities High Yield Trust Deeds









































American Private Money Group Trust Deed Investments Trust Deed Opportunities High Yield Trust Deeds









































American Private Money Group Trust Deed Investments Trust Deed Opportunities High Yield Trust Deeds







































Web - unit investment trusts





























































 







Search Results from:








Web

News 

Images 

Videos 










 




Ads
 





Searches related to unit investment trusts



unit investment trust pros and cons


top unit investment trusts


list of unit investment trusts


unit investment trust symbols


unit investment trust vs mutual fund


unit trust


open ended investment company


aam unit investment trust
 





Ads


News Results



India Grid Plans Eight-Fold Rise in Transmission Assets by 2022

BloombergQuint, 7/27/2017
India Grid Plans to acquire four more assets from Sterlite Power Grid Ventures.



Why Active Vs. Passive Isn't An Either/Or Choice

Seeking Alpha, 7/24/2017
Over the long term, the saying goes, you can’t beat the market — so why not join it through a passive investment strategy that mirrors exposure to a market benchmark? Apples are surely…



Axis REIT’s net property income increases 1.8% in 2Q, declares 2.17 sen DPU

MSN News, 7/24/2017
KUALA LUMPUR (July 24): Axis Real Estate Investment Trust’s (Axis REIT) net property income grew marginal to RM36.4 million from RM35.8 million...compared with RM41.8 million last year due…




 


News Results



3 Things You Need to Know About the Singapore Stock Market Today

MSN News, 7/27/2017
Here are some of the latest developments in the local stock market.



India Grid Plans Eight-Fold Rise in Transmission Assets by 2022

Bloomberg, 7/26/2017
India Grid Trust, the Asian nation’s first power transmission infrastructure trust, is aiming for an eight-fold increase in assets to 300 billion rupees ($4.7 billion) within five years to…






Shopping Results


Sort




More Shopping ➨



Coupons and Deals


Web Results



Unit Investment Trust (UIT) - Investopedia


www.investopedia.com/terms/u/uit.asp

An investment company that offers a fixed, unmanaged portfolio, generally of stocks and bonds, as redeemable "units" to investors for a specific period of time. It is ...



Unit investment trust - Wikipedia


en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Unit_investment_trust

In U.S. financial law, a unit investment trust (UIT) is an exchange-traded mutual fund offering a fixed (unmanaged) portfolio of securities having a definite life.



SEC.gov | Unit Investment Trusts (UITS)


www.sec.gov/fast-answers/answersuithtm.html

A"unit investment trust," commonly referred to as a "UIT," is one of three basic types of investment company. The other two types are mutual funds and closed-end funds.



Unit Investment Trusts (UIT) | Guggenheim Investments


www.guggenheiminvestments.com/uit

Guggenheim Unit Investment Trusts, or UITs, offer the convenience and diversification of owning a portfolio of securities in a packaged investment.



Why Unit Investment Trusts Can Be A Good Investment ...


www.forbes.com/…ites/advisor/2013/04/22/why-unit...

According to the Investment Company Institute (ICI), data on the market value of unit investment trusts (UITs) issued and outstanding as of year-end 2012 ...



Should I Invest in Unit Investment Trusts ... - The Balance


www.thebalance.com/…-i-invest-in-unit-investment...

How to know if it is a good idea to invest in Unit Investment Trusts, and how to know if it is better to invest in a UIT or a mutual fund.



Unit Investment Trust - Morningstar


www.morningstar.com/…ary/unit_investment_trust.aspx

Unit Investment Trust - Definition for Unit Investment Trust from Morningstar - A structure used by some ETFs.



Invesco - Unit Trusts - Financial Products


www.invesco.com/…rtal/site/us/investors/unit-trusts

Unit Trusts. Unit Trusts provide a simple, convenient way to gain exposure to an asset class, market sector or investment discipline. Like a traditional mutual fund ...



First Trust - www.FTPortfolios.com


www.ftportfolios.com/Retail/dp/home.aspx

First Trust Portfolios L.P. 120 E. Liberty Drive Suite 400 Wheaton, Il 60187 630.765.8000 1.800.621.1675 Contact Us : Unit Investment Trusts. First Trust Portfolios L ...



Unit Investment Trusts - Unit Trusts - Advisors ... - AAM Home


www.aamlive.com/UIT

Unit Investment Trusts (UITs) are sold only by prospectus. Investors should read the prospectus carefully before investing which contains a detailed explanation of ...



The Pros and Cons of Buying Unit Investment Trusts - WSJ


www.wsj.com/…es/the-pros-and-cons-of-buying-unit...

What are UITs and what are the pluses and minuses? Unit investment trusts, or UITs, are a kind of investment fund that’s a cross between an actively managed fund ...



Unit Investment Trust | Definition of Unit Investment ...


www.merriam-webster.com/…/unit%20investment%20trust

Define unit investment trust: an investment company that buys a fixed portfolio of securities and holds them for a specified period of time after…



Unit Investment Trusts - Investment Solutions | Raymond James


www.raymondjames.com/.../unit-investment-trusts

This guide will help you better understand the features, costs and risks associated with unit investment trusts (UITs).





Ads
 




1

2


3


4


5


Next


 













 







Search Results from:










© 2017 Infospace Holdings LLC
About
 | 
Privacy Policy
 | 
Terms of Use
 | 
Contact Us



























